Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin (b) If an appropriation in this article is enacted more than once in the 2025 regular or special legislative session, the appropriation must be given effect only once. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF EMPLOYMENT AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENTnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 145,034,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 109,490,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 80,513,000 new text end new text begin 80,513,000 new text end new text begin Family and Medical Benefit Insurance new text end new text begin 40,544,000 new text end new text begin 5,000,000 new text end new text begin Remediation new text end new text begin 700,000 new text end new text begin 700,000 new text end new text begin Workforce Development new text end new text begin 23,277,000 new text end new text begin 23,277,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Business and Community Development new text end new text begin 20,489,000 new text end new text begin 20,489,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 19,789,000 new text end new text begin 19,789,000 new text end new text begin Remediation new text end new text begin 700,000 new text end new text begin 700,000 new text end new text begin (a) $1,037,000 each year is for the greater Minnesota business development public infrastructure grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.431. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin (b) $500,000 each year is for grants to small business development centers under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.68. Money made available under this paragraph may be used to match funds under the federal Small Business Development Center (SBDC) program under United States Code, title 15, section 648, to provide consulting and technical services or to build additional SBDC network capacity to serve entrepreneurs and small businesses. new text end new text begin (c) $2,725,000 each year is for the small business assistance partnerships program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.682. All grant awards must be for two consecutive years. Grants must be awarded in the first year. The department may use up to five percent of the appropriation for administrative purposes. new text end new text begin (d) $350,000 each year is for administration of the community energy transition office under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.5491. new text end new text begin (e) $1,022,000 each year is for contaminated site cleanup and development grants under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116J.551 to 116J.558. This appropriation is available until expended. new text end new text begin (f) $700,000 each year is from the remediation fund for contaminated site cleanup and development grants under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116J.551 to 116J.558. This appropriation is available until expended. new text end new text begin (g) $139,000 each year is for the Center for Rural Policy and Development. new text end new text begin (h) $25,000 each year is for the administration of state aid for the Destination Medical Center Corporation under Minnesota Statutes, sections 469.40 to 469.47. new text end new text begin (i) $875,000 each year is for the host community economic development program established in Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.548. new text end new text begin (j)(1) $1,500,000 each year is for grants to local communities to increase the number of quality child care providers to support economic development. Fifty percent of grant money must go to communities located outside the seven-county metropolitan area as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (2) Grant recipients must obtain a 50 percent nonstate match to grant money in either cash or in-kind contribution, unless the commissioner waives the requirement. Grant money available under this subdivision must be used to implement projects to reduce the child care shortage in the state, including but not limited to funding for child care business start-ups or expansion, training, facility modifications, direct subsidies or incentives to retain employees, or improvements required for licensing and assistance with licensing and other regulatory requirements. In awarding grants, the commissioner must give priority to communities that have demonstrated a shortage of child care providers. new text end new text begin (3) Within one year of receiving grant money, grant recipients must report to the commissioner on the outcomes of the grant program, including but not limited to the number of new providers, the number of additional child care provider jobs created, the number of additional child care slots, and the amount of cash and in-kind local money invested. Within one month of all grant recipients reporting on program outcomes, the commissioner must report the grant recipients' outcomes to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over early learning and child care and economic development. new text end new text begin (k) $500,000 each year is for the Office of Child Care Community Partnerships. Of this amount: new text end new text begin (1) $450,000 each year is for administration of the Office of Child Care Community Partnerships; and new text end new text begin (2) $50,000 each year is for the Labor Market Information Office to conduct research and analysis related to the child care industry. new text end new text begin (l) $1,000,000 each year is for grants in equal amounts to each of the Minnesota Initiative Foundations. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. The Minnesota Initiative Foundations must use grant money under this section to: new text end new text begin (1) facilitate planning processes for rural communities resulting in a community solution action plan that guides decision making to sustain and increase the supply of quality child care in the region to support economic development; new text end new text begin (2) engage the private sector to invest local resources to support the community solution action plan and ensure quality child care is a vital component of additional regional economic development planning processes; new text end new text begin (3) provide locally based training and technical assistance to rural child care business owners individually or through a learning cohort. Access to financial and business development assistance must prepare child care businesses for quality engagement and improvement by stabilizing operations, leveraging funding from other sources, and fostering business acumen that allows child care businesses to plan for and afford the cost of providing quality child care; and new text end new text begin (4) recruit child care programs to participate in quality rating and improvement measurement programs. The Minnesota Initiative Foundations must work with local partners to provide low-cost training, professional development opportunities, and continuing education curricula. The Minnesota Initiative Foundations must fund through local partners an enhanced level of coaching to rural child care providers to obtain a quality rating through measurement programs. new text end new text begin (m) $1,246,000 each year is for the redevelopment program under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116J.575 and 116J.5761. new text end new text begin (n) $1,000,000 each year is for the Minnesota emerging entrepreneur loan program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116M.18. Money available under this paragraph is for transfer into the emerging entrepreneur program special revenue fund account created under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 116M, and is available until expended. Of this amount, up to four percent is for administration and monitoring of the program. new text end new text begin (o) $12,000 each year is for a grant to the Upper Minnesota Film Office. new text end new text begin (p) $250,000 each year is for the publication, dissemination, and use of labor market information under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.401. new text end new text begin (q) $3,000,000 each year is for the CanStartup program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.659. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Employment and Training Services new text end new text begin 26,615,000 new text end new text begin 26,615,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 11,263,000 new text end new text begin 11,263,000 new text end new text begin Workforce Development new text end new text begin 15,352,000 new text end new text begin 15,352,000 new text end new text begin (a) $500,000 each year is from the workforce development fund for rural career counseling coordinators in the workforce service areas and for the purposes specified under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.667. new text end new text begin (b) $1,275,000 each year is for the transformative career pathways workforce grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.43. The department may use up to five percent of this appropriation for administration, monitoring, and oversight of the program. new text end new text begin (c) $750,000 each year is for the women and high-wage, high-demand, nontraditional jobs grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.99. Of this amount, up to five percent is for administration and monitoring of the program. new text end new text begin (d) $3,990,000 each year from the general fund and $5,954,000 each year from the workforce development fund are for the pathways to prosperity competitive grant program. Of this amount, up to five percent is for administration and monitoring of the program. new text end new text begin (e) $500,000 each year is from the workforce development fund for current Minnesota affiliates of OIC of America, Inc. This appropriation must be divided equally among the eligible centers. new text end new text begin (f) $1,000,000 each year is for competitive grants to organizations providing services to relieve economic disparities in the Southeast Asian community through workforce recruitment, job development, job creation, assistance of smaller organizations to increase capacity, and outreach. Of this amount, up to five percent is for administration and monitoring of the program. new text end new text begin (g) $1,125,000 each year is for a competitive grant program to provide grants to organizations that provide support services for individuals including job training, employment preparation, internships, job assistance to parents, financial literacy, academic and behavioral interventions for low-performing students, and youth intervention. Grants made under this paragraph must focus on low-income communities, young adults from families with a history of intergenerational poverty, and communities of color. Of this amount, up to five percent is for administration and monitoring of the program. new text end new text begin (h) $1,500,000 each year from the general fund and $3,348,000 each year from the workforce development fund are for the youth-at-work competitive grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.562. Of this amount, up to five percent is for administration and monitoring of the youth workforce development competitive grant program. All grant awards must be for two consecutive years. Grants must be awarded in the first year. new text end new text begin (i) $1,000,000 each year is from the workforce development fund for the youthbuild program under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116L.361 to 116L.366. new text end new text begin (j) $4,050,000 each year is from the workforce development fund for the Minnesota youth program under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116L.56 and 116L.561. new text end new text begin (k) $750,000 each year is for the Office of New Americans under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.4231. new text end new text begin (l) $25,000 each year is for a grant to the University of Minnesota Tourism Center for ongoing system maintenance, management, and content updates for an online hospitality training program in partnership with Explore Minnesota Tourism. This training program must be made available at no cost to Minnesota residents in an effort to address critical workforce shortages in the hospitality and tourism industries and assist in career development. new text end new text begin (m) $150,000 each year is for prevailing wage staff under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.871, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (n)(1) $250,000 each year is for the commissioner to, in consultation with the commissioner of children, youth, and families, purchase and operate an online early childhood development professional educator program to be available at no cost to early childhood educators, Minnesota residents, and high school students. Of this amount, up to $50,000 each year is for reimbursing participating schools for the expense of supporting the program. School reimbursements must be done on a first-come, first-served basis, though at least 50 percent must go to schools outside the seven-county metropolitan area, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (2) The program selected must: new text end new text begin (i) include all of the coursework in English or Spanish necessary to earn a child development associate credential upon successful completion; new text end new text begin (ii) provide courses allowing for the award of continuing education units accredited by the International Accreditors for Continuing Education and Training; new text end new text begin (iii) provide health and safety courses meeting federal annual training requirements under the child care development block grant and the child care and development fund; new text end new text begin (iv) be usable for students in high school career and technical programs if requested by school districts; new text end new text begin (v) be based on research and developmentally appropriate practices as defined by national professional organizations such as the National Association for the Education of Young Children; new text end new text begin (vi) include content that spans early childhood development from birth to age five and that covers topics such as developmental milestones, health and safety, working with children with special needs, supporting families, the Science of Reading, and running a high-quality early education program; new text end new text begin (vii) include videos, interactive games, knowledge checks, and writing assignments; new text end new text begin (viii) have a system for program administrators and state agencies to capture course completion data, certification status, and individual and group professional development progress; new text end new text begin (ix) be accessible on a range of computers, tablets, and mobile devices; new text end new text begin (x) include professional development opportunities that are both synchronous and asynchronous; new text end new text begin (xi) foster a professional learning community with access to early childhood content experts and opportunities to share knowledge with peers around the country; new text end new text begin (xii) provide a user-friendly system with support by a customer help desk; and new text end new text begin (xiii) support a professional development system housed on a learning management system with proven capability to provide reliable simultaneous access to a network of early educators. new text end new text begin (o) $448,000 each year is for a grant to the Minnesota STEM Ecosystem. Grant money must be used to support STEM learning opportunities and workforce development within the science and technology areas. The Minnesota STEM Ecosystem may award grants to programs that support STEM learning and workforce development to ensure strategic alignment of STEM initiatives across the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin General Support Services new text end new text begin 5,028,000 new text end new text begin 5,028,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General Fund new text end new text begin 4,933,000 new text end new text begin 4,933,000 new text end new text begin Workforce Development new text end new text begin 95,000 new text end new text begin 95,000 new text end new text begin Of these amounts, $1,269,000 each year is for transfer to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for operating the Olmstead Compliance Office. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Minnesota Trade Office new text end new text begin 2,242,000 new text end new text begin 2,242,000 new text end new text begin (a) $300,000 each year is for the STEP grants in Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.979. new text end new text begin (b) $180,000 each year is for the Invest Minnesota marketing initiative under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.9781. new text end new text begin (c) $270,000 each year is for the Minnesota Trade Offices under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.978. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Vocational Rehabilitation new text end new text begin 41,691,000 new text end new text begin 41,691,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 33,861,000 new text end new text begin 33,861,000 new text end new text begin Workforce Development new text end new text begin 7,830,000 new text end new text begin 7,830,000 new text end new text begin (a) $16,800,000 each year is for the state's vocational rehabilitation program under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 268A. new text end new text begin (b) $11,495,000 each year from the general fund and $6,830,000 each year from the workforce development fund are for extended employment services for persons with severe disabilities under Minnesota Statutes, section 268A.15. Of the amounts appropriated from the general fund, $4,500,000 each year is for maintaining prior rate increases to providers of extended employment services for persons with severe disabilities under Minnesota Statutes, section 268A.15. new text end new text begin (c) $2,555,000 each year is for grants to programs that provide employment support services to persons with mental illness under Minnesota Statutes, sections 268A.13 and 268A.14. new text end new text begin (d) $3,011,000 each year is for grants to centers for independent living under Minnesota Statutes, section 268A.11. new text end new text begin (e) $1,000,000 each year is from the workforce development fund for grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 268A.16, for employment services for persons, including transition-age youth, who are deaf, deafblind, or hard-of-hearing. If the amount in the first year is insufficient, the amount in the second year is available in the first year. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Services for the Blind new text end new text begin 8,425,000 new text end new text begin 8,425,000 new text end new text begin Of these amounts, $500,000 each year is for senior citizens who are becoming blind. At least one-half of the money for this purpose must be used to provide training services for seniors who are becoming blind. Training services must provide independent living skills to seniors who are becoming blind to allow them to continue to live independently in their homes. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Paid Leave new text end new text begin 40,544,000 new text end new text begin 5,000,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is from the family and medical benefit insurance account for the purposes of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 268B. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin EXPLORE MINNESOTA TOURISMnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 17,032,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 17,032,000 new text end new text begin Of these amounts, $500,000 each year must be matched from nonstate sources to develop maximum private sector involvement in tourism. Each $1 of state incentive must be matched with $6 of private sector money. "Matched" means revenue to the state or documented in-kind, soft match, or cash expenditures directly expended to support Explore Minnesota under Minnesota Statutes, section 116U.05. The incentive in fiscal year 2026 is based on fiscal year 2025 private sector contributions. The incentive in fiscal year 2027 is based on fiscal year 2026 private sector contributions. This incentive is ongoing. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRYnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 51,128,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 50,657,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 9,160,000 new text end new text begin 9,179,000 new text end new text begin Family and Medical Benefit new text end new text begin 366,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin Workers' Compensation new text end new text begin 34,776,000 new text end new text begin 34,652,000 new text end new text begin Workforce Development new text end new text begin 6,826,000 new text end new text begin 6,826,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin General Support new text end new text begin 10,990,000 new text end new text begin 11,300,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is from the workers' compensation fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Labor Standards new text end new text begin 9,031,000 new text end new text begin 8,731,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 6,969,000 new text end new text begin 7,035,000 new text end new text begin Family and Medical Benefit new text end new text begin 366,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin Workforce Development new text end new text begin 1,696,000 new text end new text begin 1,696,000 new text end new text begin (a) $2,046,000 each year is for wage theft prevention. new text end new text begin (b) $1,696,000 each year is from the workforce development fund for prevailing wage enforcement. new text end new text begin (c) $355,000 each year is for education and training related to employee misclassification. new text end new text begin (d) $1,899,000 each year is for enforcement and other duties regarding earned sick and safe time under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 177, and sections 181.9445 to 181.9448. new text end new text begin (e) $134,000 each year is for outreach and enforcement efforts related to changes to the nursing mothers, lactating employees, and pregnancy accommodations law under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 181. new text end new text begin (f) $169,000 each year is for the purposes of the Safe Workplaces for Meat and Poultry Processing Workers Act. new text end new text begin (g) $141,000 each year is to inform and educate employers relating to Minnesota Statutes, section 181.960. new text end new text begin (h) $123,000 each year is for the purposes of enforcement, education, and outreach regarding Minnesota Statutes, sections 181C.02 and 181C.03. new text end new text begin (i) $366,000 the first year and $0 the second year are from the family and medical benefit insurance account for the purposes of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 268B. new text end new text begin (j)(1) $163,000 each year is for the misclassification fraud impact report and for legal, technical, and clerical staff support for the report. Amounts appropriated are available in either year and are available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (2) The commissioner of labor and industry may enter into interagency agreements with the commissioners of employment and economic development and revenue to transfer funds appropriated under clause (1) to cover costs associated with the misclassification fraud impact report. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Workers' Compensation new text end new text begin 15,725,000 new text end new text begin 15,725,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is from the workers' compensation fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Workplace Safety new text end new text begin 8,061,000 new text end new text begin 7,627,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is from the workers' compensation fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Employment-Based Initiatives new text end new text begin 2,404,000 new text end new text begin 2,404,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 33,000 new text end new text begin 33,000 new text end new text begin Workforce Development new text end new text begin 2,371,000 new text end new text begin 2,371,000 new text end new text begin (a) $500,000 each year is from the workforce development fund for the dual-training pipeline program. Of this amount, $200,000 each year is for the identification of competency standards under Minnesota Statutes, section 175.45, for fields other than the legal cannabis industry. new text end new text begin (b) $33,000 each year is to identify occupational competency standards and provide technical assistance for developing dual-training programs under Minnesota Statutes, section 175.45, for the legal cannabis industry. new text end new text begin (c) $1,500,000 each year is from the workforce development fund for youth skills training grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 175.46. new text end new text begin (d) $371,000 each year is from the workforce development fund for administration of the youth skills training grants program under Minnesota Statutes, section 175.46. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Combative Sports new text end new text begin 254,000 new text end new text begin 254,000 new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Apprenticeship new text end new text begin 4,259,000 new text end new text begin 4,259,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 1,500,000 new text end new text begin 1,500,000 new text end new text begin Workforce Development new text end new text begin 2,759,000 new text end new text begin 2,759,000 new text end new text begin (a) $1,000,000 each year is from the workforce development fund for labor education and advancement program grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 178.11. new text end new text begin (b) $225,000 each year is from the workforce development fund for grants to Building Strong Communities, Inc. for the Helmets to Hardhats Minnesota initiative. Grant money must be used to recruit, retain, assist, and support National Guard, reserve, and active duty military members' and veterans' participation in apprenticeship programs registered with the Department of Labor and Industry and connect service members and veterans with career training and employment in the building and construction industry. The recruitment, selection, employment, and training must be without discrimination due to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, marital status, physical or mental disability, receipt of public assistance, or age. new text end new text begin (c) $1,500,000 each year is for a registered teacher apprenticeship competitive grant program. Funds must be awarded through a competitive request for proposal process. Grant awards must be used to establish, administer, and operationalize registered teacher apprenticeship programs and joint apprenticeship training committees statewide in accordance with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 178. Grant money may be used to: new text end new text begin (1) fund personnel costs; new text end new text begin (2) design and update related instruction for the programs in coordination with teacher preparation providers approved by the Professional Educators Licensing and Standards Board; new text end new text begin (3) purchase equipment, training materials, and software licenses for apprentice tracking systems for the programs; new text end new text begin (4) fund marketing costs associated with the recruitment of signatory school districts, journeyworker teachers, and apprentices; and new text end new text begin (5) fund subawards to signatory school districts to offset costs for participation in the program. Subawards may be used for: new text end new text begin (i) apprentice tuition, scholarships, and other supportive services; and new text end new text begin (ii) journeyworker teacher stipends. new text end new text begin Grant money may not be used to pay for apprentice wages and registered apprentices must not incur any cost for their participation in the apprenticeship programs. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, payments under clause (5) must not be considered income, assets, or personal property for purposes of determining eligibility or recertifying eligibility for aid authorized by Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.1465. new text end new text begin By January 15 every year, beginning in 2028, the commissioner must report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education, higher education, labor, and workforce development on how teacher apprenticeship program funding was used and recommendations for statutory or rule changes to facilitate program improvement and expansion of teacher apprenticeship programs as a pathway to teacher licensure. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Nursing Home Workforce Standards Board new text end new text begin 404,000 new text end new text begin 357,000 new text end Sec. 5. new text begin BUREAU OF MEDIATION SERVICESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,775,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,775,000 new text end new text begin Of these amounts, $751,000 each year is for purposes of the Public Employment Relations Board under Minnesota Statutes, section 179A.041. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin WORKERS' COMPENSATION COURT OF APPEALSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,962,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,895,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is from the workers' compensation fund. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 250,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 250,000 new text end new text begin $250,000 each year is for child care improvement grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 142D.20, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (7). Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the amount for administrative costs under these appropriations is $0. new text end ARTICLE 2 APPROPRIATION MODIFICATIONS Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 53, article 20, section 2, subdivision 2, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 120, article 1, section 6, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Business and Community Development 195,061,000 139,104,000 Appropriations by Fund General 193,011,000 137,054,000 Remediation 700,000 700,000 Workforce Development 1,350,000 1,350,000 (a) $2,287,000 each year is for the greater Minnesota business development public infrastructure grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.431. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. (b) $500,000 each year is for grants to small business development centers under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.68. Money made available under this paragraph may be used to match funds under the federal Small Business Development Center (SBDC) program under United States Code, title 15, section 648, to provide consulting and technical services or to build additional SBDC network capacity to serve entrepreneurs and small businesses. (c) $2,500,000 the first year is for Launch Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation. Of this amount: (1) $1,500,000 is for innovation grants to eligible Minnesota entrepreneurs or start-up businesses to assist with their operating needs; (2) $500,000 is for administration of Launch Minnesota; and (3) $500,000 is for grantee activities at Launch Minnesota. (d)(1) $500,000 each year is for grants to MNSBIR, Inc., to support moving scientific excellence and technological innovation from the lab to the market for start-ups and small businesses by securing federal research and development funding. The purpose of the grant is to build a strong Minnesota economy and stimulate the creation of novel products, services, and solutions in the private sector; strengthen the role of small business in meeting federal research and development needs; increase the commercial application of federally supported research results; and develop and increase the Minnesota workforce, especially by fostering and encouraging participation by small businesses owned by women and people who are Black, Indigenous, or people of color. This is a onetime appropriation. (2) MNSBIR, Inc., shall use the grant money to be the dedicated resource for federal research and development for small businesses of up to 500 employees statewide to support research and commercialization of novel ideas, concepts, and projects into cutting-edge products and services for worldwide economic impact. MNSBIR, Inc., shall use grant money to: (i) assist small businesses in securing federal research and development funding, including the Small Business Innovation Research and Small Business Technology Transfer programs and other federal research and development funding opportunities; (ii) support technology transfer and commercialization from the University of Minnesota, Mayo Clinic, and federal laboratories; (iii) partner with large businesses; (iv) conduct statewide outreach, education, and training on federal rules, regulations, and requirements; (v) assist with scientific and technical writing; (vi) help manage federal grants and contracts; and (vii) support cost accounting and sole-source procurement opportunities. (e) $10,000,000 the first year is for new text begin transfer to new text end the Minnesota Expanding Opportunity Fund Program new text begin special revenue account new text end under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8733. This is a onetime deleted text begin appropriationdeleted text end new text begin transfernew text end and is available until June 30, 2025. (f) $6,425,000 each year is for the small business assistance partnerships program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.682. All grant awards shall be for two consecutive years. Grants shall be awarded in the first year. The department may use up to five percent of the appropriation for administrative purposes. The base for this appropriation is $2,725,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter. (g) $350,000 each year is for administration of the community energy transition office. (h) $5,000,000 each year is transferred from the general fund to the community energy transition account for grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.55. This is a onetime transfer. (i) $1,772,000 each year is for contaminated site cleanup and development grants under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116J.551 to 116J.558. This appropriation is available until expended. (j) $700,000 each year is from the remediation fund for contaminated site cleanup and development grants under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116J.551 to 116J.558. This appropriation is available until expended. (k) $389,000 each year is for the Center for Rural Policy and Development. The base for this appropriation is $139,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter. (l) $25,000 each year is for the administration of state aid for the Destination Medical Center under Minnesota Statutes, sections 469.40 to 469.47. (m) $875,000 each year is for the host community economic development program established in Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.548. (n) $6,500,000 each year is for grants to local communities to increase the number of quality child care providers to support economic development. Fifty percent of grant money must go to communities located outside the seven-county metropolitan area as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. The base for this appropriation is $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter. Grant recipients must obtain a 50 percent nonstate match to grant money in either cash or in-kind contribution, unless the commissioner waives the requirement. Grant money available under this subdivision must be used to implement projects to reduce the child care shortage in the state, including but not limited to funding for child care business start-ups or expansion, training, facility modifications, direct subsidies or incentives to retain employees, or improvements required for licensing, and assistance with licensing and other regulatory requirements. In awarding grants, the commissioner must give priority to communities that have demonstrated a shortage of child care providers. Within one year of receiving grant money, grant recipients must report to the commissioner on the outcomes of the grant program, including but not limited to the number of new providers, the number of additional child care provider jobs created, the number of additional child care openings, and the amount of cash and in-kind local money invested. Within one month of all grant recipients reporting on program outcomes, the commissioner must report the grant recipients' outcomes to the chairs and ranking members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over early learning and child care and economic development. (o) $500,000 each year is for the Office of Child Care Community Partnerships. Of this amount: (1) $450,000 each year is for administration of the Office of Child Care Community Partnerships; and (2) $50,000 each year is for the Labor Market Information Office to conduct research and analysis related to the child care industry. (p) $3,500,000 each year is for grants in equal amounts to each of the Minnesota Initiative Foundations. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. The base for this appropriation is $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter. The Minnesota Initiative Foundations must use grant money under this section to: (1) facilitate planning processes for rural communities resulting in a community solution action plan that guides decision making to sustain and increase the supply of quality child care in the region to support economic development; (2) engage the private sector to invest local resources to support the community solution action plan and ensure quality child care is a vital component of additional regional economic development planning processes; (3) provide locally based training and technical assistance to rural business owners individually or through a learning cohort. Access to financial and business development assistance must prepare child care businesses for quality engagement and improvement by stabilizing operations, leveraging funding from other sources, and fostering business acumen that allows child care businesses to plan for and afford the cost of providing quality child care; and (4) recruit child care programs to participate in quality rating and improvement measurement programs. The Minnesota Initiative Foundations must work with local partners to provide low-cost training, professional development opportunities, and continuing education curricula. The Minnesota Initiative Foundations must fund, through local partners, an enhanced level of coaching to rural child care providers to obtain a quality rating through measurement programs. (q) $8,000,000 each year is for the Minnesota job creation fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8748. Of this amount, the commissioner of employment and economic development may use up to three percent for administrative expenses. This appropriation is available until expended. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8748, money appropriated for the job creation fund may be used for redevelopment under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116J.575 and 116J.5761, at the discretion of the commissioner. (r) $12,370,000 each year is for the Minnesota investment fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8731. Of this amount, the commissioner of employment and economic development may use up to three percent for administration and monitoring of the program. This appropriation is available until expended. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8731, money appropriated to the commissioner for the Minnesota investment fund may be used for the redevelopment program under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116J.575 and 116J.5761, at the discretion of the commissioner. Grants under this paragraph are not subject to the grant amount limitation under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8731. (s) $4,246,000 each year is for the redevelopment program under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116J.575 and 116J.5761. The base for this appropriation is $2,246,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter. This appropriation is available until expended. (t) $1,000,000 each year is for the Minnesota emerging entrepreneur loan program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116M.18. Money available under this paragraph is for transfer into the emerging entrepreneur program special revenue fund account created under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 116M, and are available until expended. Of this amount, up to four percent is for administration and monitoring of the program. (u) $325,000 the first year is for the Minnesota Film and TV Board. The appropriation is available only upon receipt by the board of $1 in matching contributions of money or in-kind contributions from nonstate sources for every $3 provided by this appropriation, except that up to $50,000 is available on July 1 even if the required matching contribution has not been received by that date. This is a onetime appropriation. (v) $12,000 each year is for a grant to the Upper Minnesota Film Office. (w) $500,000 the first year is for a grant to the Minnesota Film and TV Board for the film production jobs program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116U.26. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. This is a onetime appropriation. (x) $4,195,000 each year is for the Minnesota job skills partnership program under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116L.01 to 116L.17. If the appropriation for either year is insufficient, the appropriation for the other year is available. This appropriation is available until expended. (y) $1,350,000 each year from the workforce development fund is for jobs training grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.41. (z) $47,475,000 the first year and $50,475,000 the second year are for the PROMISE grant program. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. Any unencumbered balance remaining at the end of the first year does not cancel but is available the second year. Of this amount: (1) $475,000 each year is for administration of the PROMISE grant program; (2) $7,500,000 each year is for grants in equal amounts to each of the Minnesota Initiative Foundations to serve businesses in greater Minnesota. Of this amount, $600,000 each year is for grants to businesses with less than $100,000 in revenue in the prior year; and (3) $39,500,000 the first year and $42,500,000 the second year are for grants to the Neighborhood Development Center. Of this amount, the following amounts are designated for the following areas: (i) $16,000,000 each year is for North Minneapolis' West Broadway, Camden, or other Northside neighborhoods. Of this amount, $1,000,000 each year is for grants to businesses with less than $100,000 in revenue in the prior year; (ii) deleted text begin $13,500,000deleted text end new text begin $12,500,000new text end each year is for South Minneapolis' Lake Street, 38th and Chicago, Franklin, Nicollet, and Riverside corridors. Of this amount, $750,000 each year is for grants to businesses with less than $100,000 in revenue in the prior year; (iii) $10,000,000 each year is for St. Paul's University Avenue, Midway, Eastside, or other St. Paul neighborhoods. Of this amount, $750,000 each year is for grants to businesses with less than $100,000 in revenue in the prior year; (iv) $1,000,000 the first year is for South Minneapolis' Hennepin Avenue Commercial corridor, South Hennepin Community corridor, and Uptown Special Service District; and (v) $3,000,000 the second year is for grants to businesses in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington, excluding the cities of Minneapolis and St. Paul. (aa) $15,150,000 each year is for the PROMISE loan program. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. Of this amount: (1) $150,000 each year is for administration of the PROMISE loan program; (2) $3,000,000 each year is for grants in equal amounts to each of the Minnesota Initiative Foundations to serve businesses in greater Minnesota; and (3) $12,000,000 each year is for grants to the Metropolitan Economic Development Association (MEDA). Of this amount, the following amounts are designated for the following areas: (i) $4,500,000 each year is for North Minneapolis' West Broadway, Camden, or other Northside neighborhoods; (ii) $4,500,000 each year is for South Minneapolis' Lake Street, 38th and Chicago, Franklin, Nicollet, and Riverside corridors; and (iii) $3,000,000 each year is for St. Paul's University Avenue, Midway, Eastside, or other St. Paul neighborhoods. (bb) $1,500,000 each year is for a grant to the Metropolitan Consortium of Community Developers for the community wealth-building grant program pilot project. Of this amount, up to two percent is for administration and monitoring of the community wealth-building grant program pilot project. This is a onetime appropriation. (cc) $250,000 each year is for the publication, dissemination, and use of labor market information under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.401. (dd) $5,000,000 the first year is for a grant to the Bloomington Port Authority to provide funding for the Expo 2027 host organization. The Bloomington Port Authority must enter into an agreement with the host organization over the use of money, which may be used for activities, including but not limited to finalizing the community dossier and staffing the host organization and for infrastructure design and planning, financial modeling, development planning and coordination of both real estate and public private partnerships, and reimbursement of costs the Bloomington Port Authority incurred. In selecting vendors and exhibitors for Expo 2027, the host organization shall prioritize outreach to, collaboration with, and inclusion of businesses that are majority owned by people of color, women, and people with disabilities. The host organization and Bloomington Port Authority may be reimbursed for expenses 90 days prior to encumbrance. This appropriation is contingent on approval of the project by the Bureau International des Expositions. If the project is not approved by the Bureau International des Expositions, the money shall transfer to the Minnesota investment fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8731. Any unencumbered balance remaining at the end of the first year does not cancel but is available for the second year. (ee) $5,000,000 the first year is for a grant to the Neighborhood Development Center for small business programs, including training, lending, business services, and real estate programming; small business incubator development in the Twin Cities and outside the seven-county metropolitan area; and technical assistance activities for partners outside the seven-county metropolitan area; and for high-risk, character-based loan capital for nonrecourse loans. This is a onetime appropriation. Any unencumbered balance remaining at the end of the first year does not cancel but is available for the second year. (ff) $5,000,000 the first year is for transfer to the emerging developer fund account in the special revenue fund. Of this amount, up to five percent is for administration and monitoring of the emerging developer fund program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.9926, and the remainder is for a grant to the Local Initiatives Support Corporation - Twin Cities to serve as a partner organization under the program. This is a onetime appropriation. (gg) $5,000,000 the first year is for the Canadian border counties economic relief program under article 5. Of this amount, up to $1,000,000 is for Tribal economic development and $2,100,000 is for a grant to Lake of the Woods County for the forgivable loan program for remote recreational businesses. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. (hh) $1,000,000 each year is for a grant to African Economic Development Solutions. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. Of this amount: (1) $500,000 each year is for a loan fund that must address pervasive economic inequities by supporting business ventures of entrepreneurs in the African immigrant community; and (2) $250,000 each year is for workforce development and technical assistance, including but not limited to business development, entrepreneur training, business technical assistance, loan packing, and community development services. (ii) $1,500,000 each year is for a grant to the Latino Economic Development Center. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2025. Of this amount: (1) $750,000 each year is to assist, support, finance, and launch microentrepreneurs by delivering training, workshops, and one-on-one consultations to businesses; and (2) $750,000 each year is to guide prospective entrepreneurs in their start-up process by introducing them to key business concepts, including business start-up readiness. Grant proceeds must be used to offer workshops on a variety of topics throughout the year, including finance, customer service, food-handler training, and food-safety certification. Grant proceeds may also be used to provide lending to business startups. (jj) $627,000 the first year is for a grant to Community and Economic Development Associates (CEDA) to provide funding for economic development technical assistance and economic development project grants to small communities across rural Minnesota and for CEDA to design, implement, market, and administer specific types of basic community and economic development programs tailored to individual community needs. Technical assistance grants shall be based on need and given to communities that are otherwise unable to afford these services. Of the amount appropriated, up to $270,000 may be used for economic development project implementation in conjunction with the technical assistance received. This is a onetime appropriation. Any unencumbered balance remaining at the end of the first year does not cancel but is available the second year. (kk) $2,000,000 the first year is for a grant to WomenVenture to: (1) support child care providers through business training and shared services programs and to create materials that could be used, free of charge, for start-up, expansion, and operation of child care businesses statewide, with the goal of helping new and existing child care businesses in underserved areas of the state become profitable and sustainable; and (2) support business expansion for women food entrepreneurs throughout Minnesota's food supply chain to help stabilize and strengthen their business operations, create distribution networks, offer technical assistance and support to beginning women food entrepreneurs, develop business plans, develop a workforce, research expansion strategies, and for other related activities. Eligible uses of the money include but are not limited to: (i) leasehold improvements; (ii) additions, alterations, remodeling, or renovations to rented space; (iii) inventory or supplies; (iv) machinery or equipment purchases; (v) working capital; and (vi) debt refinancing. Money distributed to entrepreneurs may be loans, forgivable loans, and grants. Of this amount, up to five percent may be used for the WomenVenture's technical assistance and administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. By December 15, 2026, WomenVenture must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture and employment and economic development. The report must include a summary of the uses of the appropriation, including the amount of the appropriation used for administration. The report must also provide a breakdown of the amount of funding used for loans, forgivable loans, and grants; information about the terms of the loans issued; a discussion of how money from repaid loans will be used; the number of entrepreneurs assisted; and a breakdown of how many entrepreneurs received assistance in each county. (ll) $2,000,000 the first year is for a grant to African Career, Education, and Resource, Inc., for operational infrastructure and technical assistance to small businesses. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2025. (mm) $5,000,000 the first year is for a grant to the African Development Center to provide loans to purchase commercial real estate and to expand organizational infrastructure. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2025. Of this amount: (1) $2,800,000 is for loans to purchase commercial real estate targeted at African immigrant small business owners; (2) $364,000 is for loan loss reserves to support loan volume growth and attract additional capital; (3) $836,000 is for increasing organizational capacity; (4) $300,000 is for the safe 2 eat project of inclusive assistance with required restaurant licensing examinations; and (5) $700,000 is for a center for community resources for language and technology assistance for small businesses. (nn) $7,000,000 the first year is for grants to the Minnesota Initiative Foundations to capitalize their revolving loan funds, which address unmet financing needs of for-profit business start-ups, expansions, and ownership transitions; nonprofit organizations; and developers of housing to support the construction, rehabilitation, and conversion of housing units. Of the amount appropriated: (1) $1,000,000 is for a grant to the Southwest Initiative Foundation; (2) $1,000,000 is for a grant to the West Central Initiative Foundation; (3) $1,000,000 is for a grant to the Southern Minnesota Initiative Foundation; (4) $1,000,000 is for a grant to the Northwest Minnesota Foundation; (5) $2,000,000 is for a grant to the Initiative Foundation of which $1,000,000 is for redevelopment of the St. Cloud Youth and Family Center; and (6) $1,000,000 is for a grant to the Northland Foundation. (oo) $500,000 each year is for a grant to Enterprise Minnesota, Inc., to reach and deliver talent, leadership, employee retention, continuous improvement, strategy, quality management systems, revenue growth, and manufacturing peer-to-peer advisory services to small manufacturing companies employing 35 or fewer full-time equivalent employees. This is a onetime appropriation. No later than February 1, 2025, and February 1, 2026, Enterprise Minnesota, Inc., must provide a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development that includes: (1) the grants awarded during the past 12 months; (2) the estimated financial impact of the grants awarded to each company receiving services under the program; (3) the actual financial impact of grants awarded during the past 24 months; and (4) the total amount of federal funds leveraged from the Manufacturing Extension Partnership at the United States Department of Commerce. (pp) $375,000 each year is for a grant to PFund Foundation to provide grants to LGBTQ+-owned small businesses and entrepreneurs. Of this amount, up to five percent may be used for PFund Foundation's technical assistance and administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. To the extent practicable, money must be distributed by PFund Foundation as follows: (1) at least 33.3 percent to businesses owned by members of racial minority communities; and (2) at least 33.3 percent to businesses outside of the seven-county metropolitan area as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. (qq) $125,000 each year is for a grant to Quorum to provide business support, training, development, technical assistance, and related activities for LGBTQ+-owned small businesses that are recipients of a PFund Foundation grant. Of this amount, up to five percent may be used for Quorum's technical assistance and administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. (rr) $5,000,000 the first year is for a grant to the Metropolitan Economic Development Association (MEDA) for statewide business development and assistance services to minority-owned businesses. This is a onetime appropriation. Any unencumbered balance remaining at the end of the first year does not cancel but is available the second year. Of this amount: (1) $3,000,000 is for a revolving loan fund to provide additional minority-owned businesses with access to capital; and (2) $2,000,000 is for operating support activities related to business development and assistance services for minority business enterprises. By February 1, 2025, MEDA shall report to the commissioner and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development policy and finance on the loans and operating support activities, including outcomes and expenditures, supported by the appropriation under this paragraph. (ss) $2,500,000 each year is for a grant to a Minnesota-based automotive component manufacturer and distributor specializing in electric vehicles and sensor technology that manufactures all of their parts onshore to expand their manufacturing. The grant recipient under this paragraph shall submit reports on the uses of the money appropriated, the number of jobs created due to the appropriation, wage information, and the city and state in which the additional manufacturing activity was located to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development. An initial report shall be submitted by December 15, 2023, and a final report is due by December 15, 2025. This is a onetime appropriation. (tt)(1) $125,000 each year is for grants to the Latino Chamber of Commerce Minnesota to support the growth and expansion of small businesses statewide. Funds may be used for the cost of programming, outreach, staffing, and supplies. This is a onetime appropriation. (2) By January 15, 2026, the Latino Chamber of Commerce Minnesota must submit a report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development that details the use of grant funds and the grant's economic impact. (uu) $175,000 the first year is for a grant to the city of South St. Paul to study options for repurposing the 1927 American Legion Memorial Library after the property is no longer used as a library. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. (vv) $250,000 the first year is for a grant to LatinoLEAD for organizational capacity-building. (ww) $80,000 the first year is for a grant to the Neighborhood Development Center for small business competitive grants to software companies working to improve employee engagement and workplace culture and to reduce turnover. (xx)(1) $3,000,000 in the first year is for a grant to the Center for Economic Inclusion for strategic, data-informed investments in job creation strategies that respond to the needs of underserved populations statewide. This may include forgivable loans, revenue-based financing, and equity investments for entrepreneurs with barriers to growth. Of this amount, up to five percent may be used for the center's technical assistance and administrative costs. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2025. (2) By January 15, 2026, the Center for Economic Inclusion shall submit a report on the use of grant funds, including any loans made, to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development. (yy) $500,000 the first year is for a grant to the Asian Economic Development Association for asset building and financial empowerment for entrepreneurs and small business owners, small business development and technical assistance, and cultural placemaking. This is a onetime appropriation. (zz) $500,000 each year is for a grant to Isuroon to support primarily African immigrant women with entrepreneurial training to start, manage, and grow self-sustaining microbusinesses, develop incubator space for these businesses, and provide support with financial and language literacy, systems navigation to eliminate capital access disparities, marketing, and other technical assistance. This is a onetime appropriation. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively to July 1, 2023. new text end Sec. 2. Laws 2023, chapter 53, article 20, section 2, subdivision 3, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 120, article 1, section 7, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Employment and Training Programs 112,038,000 104,499,000 Appropriations by Fund 2024 2025 General 91,036,000 83,497,000 Workforce Development 21,002,000 21,002,000 (a) $500,000 each year from the general fund and $500,000 each year from the workforce development fund are for rural career counseling coordinators in the workforce service areas and for the purposes specified under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.667. (b) $25,000,000 each year is for the targeted population workforce grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.43. The department may use up to five percent of this appropriation for administration, monitoring, and oversight of the program. Of this amount: (1) $18,500,000 each year is for job and entrepreneurial skills training grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.43, subdivision 2; (2) $1,500,000 each year is for diversity and inclusion training for small employers under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.43, subdivision 3; and (3) $5,000,000 each year is for capacity building grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.43, subdivision 4. The base for this appropriation is $1,275,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter. (c) $750,000 each year is for the women and high-wage, high-demand, nontraditional jobs grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.99. Of this amount, up to five percent is for administration and monitoring of the program. (d) $10,000,000 each year is for the Drive for Five Initiative to conduct outreach and provide job skills training, career counseling, case management, and supportive services for careers in (1) technology, (2) labor, (3) the caring professions, (4) manufacturing, and (5) educational and professional services. This is a onetime appropriation. (e) Of the amounts appropriated in paragraph (d), the commissioner must make $7,000,000 each year available through a competitive request for proposal process. The grant awards must be used to provide education and training in the five industries identified in paragraph (d). Education and training may include: (1) student tutoring and testing support services; (2) training and employment placement in high wage and high growth employment; (3) assistance in obtaining industry-specific certifications; (4) remedial training leading to enrollment in employment training programs or services; (5) real-time work experience; (6) career and educational counseling; (7) work experience and internships; and (8) supportive services. (f) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph (d), $2,000,000 each year must be awarded through competitive grants made to trade associations or chambers of commerce for job placement services. Grant awards must be used to encourage workforce training efforts to ensure that efforts are aligned with employer demands and that graduates are connected with employers that are currently hiring. Trade associations or chambers must partner with employers with current or anticipated employment opportunities and nonprofit workforce training partners participating in this program. The trade associations or chambers must work closely with the industry sector training providers in the five industries identified in paragraph (d). Grant awards may be used for: (1) employer engagement strategies to align employment opportunities for individuals exiting workforce development training programs. These strategies may include business recruitment, job opening development, employee recruitment, and job matching. Trade associations must utilize the state's labor exchange system; (2) diversity, inclusion, and retention training of their members to increase the business' understanding of welcoming and retaining a diverse workforce; and (3) industry-specific training. (g) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph (d), $1,000,000 each year is to hire, train, and deploy business services representatives in local workforce development areas throughout the state. Business services representatives must work with an assigned local workforce development area to address the hiring needs of Minnesota's businesses by connecting job seekers and program participants in the CareerForce system. Business services representatives serve in the classified service of the state and operate as part of the agency's Employment and Training Office. The commissioner shall develop and implement training materials and reporting and evaluation procedures for the activities of the business services representatives. The business services representatives must: (1) serve as the primary contact for businesses in that area; (2) actively engage employers by assisting with matching employers to job seekers by referring candidates, convening job fairs, and assisting with job announcements; and (3) work with the local area board and its partners to identify candidates for openings in small and midsize companies in the local area. (h) $2,546,000 each year from the general fund and $4,604,000 each year from the workforce development fund are for the pathways to prosperity competitive grant program. Of this amount, up to five percent is for administration and monitoring of the program. (i) $500,000 each year is from the workforce development fund for current Minnesota affiliates of OIC of America, Inc. This appropriation shall be divided equally among the eligible centers. (j) $1,000,000 each year is for competitive grants to organizations providing services to relieve economic disparities in the Southeast Asian community through workforce recruitment, development, job creation, assistance of smaller organizations to increase capacity, and outreach. Of this amount, up to five percent is for administration and monitoring of the program. (k) $1,000,000 each year is for a competitive grant program to provide grants to organizations that provide support services for individuals, such as job training, employment preparation, internships, job assistance to parents, financial literacy, academic and behavioral interventions for low-performing students, and youth intervention. Grants made under this section must focus on low-income communities, young adults from families with a history of intergenerational poverty, and communities of color. Of this amount, up to five percent is for administration and monitoring of the program. (l) $750,000 each year from the general fund and $6,698,000 each year from the workforce development fund are for the youth-at-work competitive grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.562. Of this amount, up to five percent is for administration and monitoring of the youth workforce development competitive grant program. All grant awards shall be for two consecutive years. Grants shall be awarded in the first year. The base for this appropriation is $750,000 from the general fund and $3,348,000 from the workforce development fund beginning in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter. (m) $1,093,000 each year is from the general fund and $1,000,000 each year is from the workforce development fund for the youthbuild program under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116L.361 to 116L.366. The base for this appropriation is $1,000,000 from the workforce development fund in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter. (n) $4,511,000 each year from the general fund and $4,050,000 each year from the workforce development fund are for the Minnesota youth program under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116L.56 and 116L.561. The base for this appropriation is $0 from the general fund and $4,050,000 from the workforce development fund in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter. (o) $750,000 each year is for the Office of New Americans under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.4231. (p) $1,000,000 each year from the workforce development fund is for a grant to the Minnesota Technology Association to support the SciTech internship program, a program that supports science, technology, engineering, and math (STEM) internship opportunities for two- and four-year college students and graduate students in their fields of study. The internship opportunities must match students with paid internships within STEM disciplines at small, for-profit companies located in Minnesota having fewer than 250 employees worldwide. At least 325 students must be matched each year. No more than 15 percent of the hires may be graduate students. Selected hiring companies shall receive from the grant 50 percent of the wages paid to the intern, capped at $3,000 per intern. The program must work toward increasing the participation among women or other underserved populations. This is a onetime appropriation. (q) $750,000 each year is for grants to the Minneapolis Park and Recreation Board's Teen Teamworks youth employment and training programs. This is a onetime appropriation and available until June 30, 2027. Any unencumbered balance remaining at the end of the first year does not cancel but is available in the second year. (r) $900,000 each year is for a grant to Avivo to provide low-income individuals with career education and job skills training that is fully integrated with chemical and mental health services. Of this amount, up to $250,000 each year is for a grant to Avivo to provide resources and support services to survivors of sex trafficking and domestic abuse in the greater St. Cloud area as they search for employment. Program resources include but are not limited to costs for day care, transportation, housing, legal advice, procuring documents required for employment, interview clothing, technology, and Internet access. The program shall also include public outreach and corporate training components to communicate to the public and potential employers about the specific struggles faced by survivors as they re-enter the workforce. This is a onetime appropriation. (s) $1,000,000 each year is for the getting to work grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.545. Of this amount, up to five percent is for administration and monitoring of the program. This is a onetime appropriation. (t) $400,000 each year is for a grant to the nonprofit 30,000 Feet to fund youth apprenticeship jobs, wraparound services, after-school programming, and summer learning loss prevention efforts targeted at African American youth. This is a onetime appropriation. (u) $463,000 the first year is for a grant to the Boys and Girls Club of Central Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation. Of this amount: (1) $313,000 is to fund one year of free full-service programming for a new program in Waite Park that will employ part-time youth development staff and provide community volunteer opportunities for people of all ages. Career exploration and life skills programming will be a significant dimension of programming at this new site; and (2) $150,000 is for planning and design for a new multiuse facility for the Boys and Girls Club of Waite Park and other community partners, including the Waite Park Police Department and the Whitney Senior Center. (v) $1,000,000 each year is for a grant to the Minnesota Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs to administer a statewide project of youth job skills and career development. This project, which may have career guidance components including health and life skills, must be designed to encourage, train, and assist youth in early access to education and job-seeking skills, work-based learning experience, including career pathways in STEM learning, career exploration and matching, and first job placement through local community partnerships and on-site job opportunities. This grant requires a 25 percent match from nonstate resources. This is a onetime appropriation. (w) $1,000,000 the first year is for a grant to the Owatonna Area Chamber of Commerce Foundation for the Learn and Earn Initiative to help the Owatonna and Steele County region grow and retain a talented workforce. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2025. Of this amount: (1) $900,000 is to develop an advanced manufacturing career pathway program for youth and adult learners with shared learning spaces, state-of-the-art equipment, and instructional support to grow and retain talent in Owatonna; and (2) $100,000 is to create the Owatonna Opportunity scholarship model for the Learn and Earn Initiative for students and employers. (x) $250,000 each year from the workforce development fund is for a grant to the White Bear Center for the Arts for establishing a paid internship program for high school students to learn professional development skills through an arts perspective. This is a onetime appropriation. (y) $250,000 each year is for the Minnesota Family Resiliency Partnership under Minnesota Statutes, section 116L.96. The commissioner, through the adult career pathways program, shall distribute the money to existing nonprofit and state displaced homemaker programs. This is a onetime appropriation. (z) $600,000 each year is for a grant to East Side Neighborhood Services. This is a onetime appropriation of which: (1) $300,000 each year is for the senior community service employment program, which provides work readiness training to low-income adults ages 55 and older to provide ongoing support and mentoring services to the program participants as well as the transition period from subsidized wages to unsubsidized wages; and (2) $300,000 each year is for the nursing assistant plus program to serve the increased need for growth of medical talent pipelines through expansion of the existing program and development of in-house training. The amounts specified in clauses (1) and (2) may also be used to enhance employment programming for youth and young adults, ages 14 to 24, to introduce them to work culture, develop essential work readiness skills, and make career plans through paid internship experiences and work readiness training. (aa) $1,500,000 each year from the workforce development fund is for a grant to Ujamaa Place to assist primarily African American men with job training, employment preparation, internships, education, vocational housing, and organizational capacity building. This is a onetime appropriation. (bb) $500,000 each year is for a grant to Comunidades Organizando el Poder y la Acción Latina (COPAL) for worker center programming that supports primarily low-income, migrant, and Latinx workers with career planning, workforce training and education, workers' rights advocacy, health resources and navigation, and wealth creation resources. This is a onetime appropriation. (cc) $2,000,000 each year is for a grant to Propel Nonprofits to provide capacity-building grants and related technical assistance to small, culturally specific organizations that primarily serve historically underserved cultural communities. Propel Nonprofits may only award grants to nonprofit organizations that have an annual organizational budget of less than $1,000,000. These grants may be used for: (1) organizational infrastructure improvements, including developing database management systems and financial systems, or other administrative needs that increase the organization's ability to access new funding sources; (2) organizational workforce development, including hiring culturally competent staff, training and skills development, and other methods of increasing staff capacity; or (3) creating or expanding partnerships with existing organizations that have specialized expertise in order to increase capacity of the grantee organization to improve services to the community. Of this amount, up to five percent may be used by Propel Nonprofits for administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation. (dd) $1,000,000 each year is for a grant to Goodwill Easter Seals Minnesota and its partners. The grant must be used to continue the FATHER Project in Rochester, St. Cloud, St. Paul, Minneapolis, and the surrounding areas to assist fathers in overcoming barriers that prevent fathers from supporting their children economically and emotionally, including with community re-entry following confinement. This is a onetime appropriation. (ee) $250,000 the first year is for a grant to the ProStart and Hospitality Tourism Management Program for a well-established, proven, and successful education program that helps young people advance careers in the hospitality industry and addresses critical long-term workforce shortages in that industry. (ff) $450,000 each year is for grants to Minnesota Diversified Industries to provide inclusive employment opportunities and services for people with disabilities. This is a onetime appropriation. (gg) $1,000,000 the first year is for a grant to Minnesota Diversified Industries to assist individuals with disabilities through the unified work model by offering virtual and in-person career skills classes augmented with virtual reality tools. Minnesota Diversified Industries shall submit a report on the number and demographics of individuals served, hours of career skills programming delivered, outreach to employers, and recommendations for future career skills delivery methods to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over labor and workforce development policy and finance by January 15, 2026. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2025. (hh) $1,264,000 each year is for a grant to Summit Academy OIC to expand employment placement, GED preparation and administration, and STEM programming in the Twin Cities, Saint Cloud, and Bemidji. This is a onetime appropriation. (ii) $500,000 each year is for a grant to Minnesota Independence College and Community to provide employment preparation, job placement, job retention, and service coordination services to adults with autism and learning differences. This is a onetime appropriation. (jj) $1,000,000 the first year and $2,000,000 the second year are for a clean economy equitable workforce grant program. Money must be used for grants to support partnership development, planning, and implementation of workforce readiness programs aimed at workers who are Black, Indigenous, and People of Color. Programs must include workforce training, career development, workers' rights training, employment placement, and culturally appropriate job readiness and must prepare workers for careers in the high-demand fields of construction, clean energy, and energy efficiency. Grants must be given to nonprofit organizations that serve historically disenfranchised communities, including new Americans, with preference for organizations that are new providers of workforce programming or which have partnership agreements with registered apprenticeship programs. This is a onetime appropriation. (kk) $350,000 the first year and $25,000 the second year are for a grant to the University of Minnesota Tourism Center for the creation and operation of an online hospitality training program in partnership with Explore Minnesota Tourism. This training program must be made available at no cost to Minnesota residents in an effort to address critical workforce shortages in the hospitality and tourism industries and assist in career development. The base for this appropriation is $25,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter for ongoing system maintenance, management, and content updates. (ll) $3,000,000 the first year is for competitive grants to support high school robotics teams and prepare youth for careers in STEM fields. Of this amount, $2,000,000 is for creating internships for high school students to work at private companies in STEM fields, including the payment of student stipends. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. (mm) $750,000 each year is for grants to the nonprofit Sanneh Foundation to fund out-of-school and summer programs focused on mentoring and behavioral, social, and emotional learning interventions and enrichment activities directed toward low-income students of color. This is a onetime appropriation and available until June 30, 2027. (nn) $1,000,000 each year is for a grant to the Hmong American Partnership to expand job training and placement programs primarily serving the Southeast Asian community. This is a onetime appropriation. (oo) $1,000,000 each year is for a grant to Comunidades Latinas Unidas En Servicio (CLUES) to address employment, economic, and technology access disparities for low-income unemployed or underemployed individuals. Grant money must support short-term certifications and transferable skills in high-demand fields, workforce readiness, customized financial capability, and employment supports. At least 50 percent of this amount must be used for programming targeted at greater Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation. (pp) $300,000 each year is for a grant to All Square. The grant must be used to support the operations of All Square's Fellowship and Prison to Law Pipeline programs which operate in Minneapolis, St. Paul, and surrounding correctional facilities to assist incarcerated and formerly incarcerated Minnesotans in overcoming employment barriers that prevent economic and emotional freedom. This is a onetime appropriation. (qq) $1,000,000 each year is for a grant to the Redemption Project to provide employment services to adults leaving incarceration, including recruiting, educating, training, and retaining employment mentors and partners. This is a onetime appropriation. (rr) $500,000 each year is for a grant to Greater Twin Cities United Way to make grants to partner organizations to provide workforce training using the career pathways model that helps students gain work experience, earn experience in high-demand fields, and transition into family-sustaining careers. This is a onetime appropriation. (ss) $3,000,000 each year is for a grant to Community Action Partnership of Hennepin County. This is a onetime appropriation. Of this amount: (1) $1,500,000 each year is for grants to 21 Days of Peace for social equity building and community engagement activities; and (2) $1,500,000 each year is for grants to A Mother's Love for community outreach, empowerment training, and employment and career exploration services. (tt) $750,000 each year is for a grant to Mind the G.A.P.P. (Gaining Assistance to Prosperity Program) to improve the quality of life of unemployed and underemployed individuals by improving their employment outcomes and developing individual earnings potential. This is a onetime appropriation. Any unencumbered balance remaining at the end of the first year does not cancel but is available in the second year. (uu) $550,000 each year is for a grant to the International Institute of Minnesota. Grant money must be used for workforce training for new Americans in industries in need of a trained workforce. This is a onetime appropriation. (vv) $400,000 each year from the workforce development fund is for a grant to Hired to expand their career pathway job training and placement program that connects lower-skilled job seekers to entry-level and gateway jobs in high-growth sectors. This is a onetime appropriation. (ww) $500,000 each year is for a grant to the American Indian Opportunities and Industrialization Center for workforce development programming, including reducing academic disparities for American Indian students and adults. This is a onetime appropriation. (xx) $500,000 each year from the workforce development fund is for a grant to the Hmong Chamber of Commerce to train ethnically Southeast Asian business owners and operators in better business practices. Of this amount, up to $5,000 may be used for administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation. (yy) $275,000 each year is for a grant to Southeast Minnesota Workforce Development Area 8 and Workforce Development, Inc., to provide career planning, career pathway training and education, wraparound support services, and job skills advancement in high-demand careers to individuals with barriers to employment in Steele County, and to help families build secure pathways out of poverty and address worker shortages in the Owatonna and Steele County area, as well as supporting Employer Outreach Services that provide solutions to workforce challenges and direct connections to workforce programming. Money may be used for program expenses, including but not limited to hiring instructors and navigators; space rental; and supportive services to help participants attend classes, including assistance with course fees, child care, transportation, and safe and stable housing. Up to five percent of grant money may be used for Workforce Development, Inc.'s administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (zz) $589,000 the first year and $588,000 the second year are for grants to the Black Women's Wealth Alliance to provide low-income individuals with job skills training, career counseling, and job placement assistance. This is a onetime appropriation. (aaa) $250,000 each year is for a grant to Abijahs on the Backside to provide equine experiential mental health therapy to first responders suffering from job-related trauma and post-traumatic stress disorder. For purposes of this paragraph, a "first responder" is a peace officer as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c); a full-time firefighter as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 299N.03, subdivision 5; or a volunteer firefighter as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 299N.03, subdivision 7. Abijahs on the Backside must report to the commissioner of employment and economic development and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over employment and economic development policy and finance on the equine experiential mental health therapy provided to first responders under this paragraph. The report must include an overview of the program's budget, a detailed explanation of program expenditures, the number of first responders served by the program, and a list and explanation of the services provided to and benefits received by program participants. An initial report is due by January 15, 2024, and a final report is due by January 15, 2026. This is a onetime appropriation. (bbb) $500,000 each year is for a grant to Ramsey County to provide job training and workforce development for underserved communities. Grant money may be subgranted to Milestone Community Development for the Milestone Tech program. This is a onetime appropriation. (ccc) $500,000 each year is for a grant to Ramsey County for a technology training pathway program focused on intergenerational community tech work for residents who are at least 18 years old and no more than 24 years old and whose household income is at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty level. Grant money may be used for program administration, training, training stipends, wages, and support services. This is a onetime appropriationnew text begin and is available until December 31, 2027new text end . (ddd) $200,000 each year is for a grant to Project Restore Minnesota for the Social Kitchen project, a pathway program for careers in the culinary arts. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (eee) $100,000 each year is for grants to the Minnesota Grocers Association Foundation for Carts to Careers, a statewide initiative to promote careers, conduct outreach, provide job skills training, and award scholarships for students pursuing careers in the food industry. This is a onetime appropriation. (fff) $1,200,000 each year is for a grant to Twin Cities R!SE. Of this amount, $700,000 each year is for performance grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8747, to Twin Cities R!SE to provide training to individuals facing barriers to employment; and $500,000 each year is to increase the capacity of the Empowerment Institute through employer partnerships across Minnesota and expansion of the youth personal empowerment curriculum. This is a onetime appropriation and available until June 30, 2026. (ggg) $750,000 each year is for a grant to Bridges to Healthcare to provide career education, wraparound support services, and job skills training in high-demand health care fields to low-income parents, nonnative speakers of English, and other hard-to-train individuals, helping families build secure pathways out of poverty while also addressing worker shortages in one of Minnesota's most innovative industries. Grants may be used for program expenses, including but not limited to hiring instructors and navigators; space rental; and supportive services to help participants attend classes, including assistance with course fees, child care, transportation, and safe and stable housing. In addition, up to five percent of grant money may be used for Bridges to Healthcare's administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation. (hhh) $500,000 each year is for a grant to Big Brothers Big Sisters of the Greater Twin Cities to provide disadvantaged youth ages 12 to 21 with job-seeking skills, connections to job training and education opportunities, and mentorship while exploring careers. The grant shall serve youth in the Big Brothers Big Sisters chapters in the Twin Cities, central Minnesota, and southern Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation. (iii) $3,000,000 each year is for a grant to Youthprise to provide economic development services designed to enhance long-term economic self-sufficiency in communities with concentrated African populations deleted text begin statewide. Of these amounts, 50 percent is for subgrants to Ka Joog and 50 percent is for competitive subgrants to community organizationsdeleted text end new text begin by offering subgrants to community organizationsnew text end . This is a onetime appropriationnew text begin and money is available until June 30, 2026new text end . (jjj) $350,000 each year is for a grant to the YWCA Minneapolis to provide training to eligible individuals, including job skills training, career counseling, and job placement assistance necessary to secure a child development associate credential and to have a career path in early education. This is a onetime appropriation. (kkk) $500,000 each year is for a grant to Emerge Community Development to support and reinforce critical workforce training at the Emerge Career and Technical Center, Cedar Riverside Opportunity Center, and Emerge Second Chance programs in the city of Minneapolis. This is a onetime appropriation. (lll) $425,000 each year is for a grant to Better Futures Minnesota to provide job skills training to individuals who have been released from incarceration for a felony-level offense and are no more than 12 months from the date of release. This is a onetime appropriation. Better Futures Minnesota shall annually report to the commissioner on how the money was spent and what results were achieved. The report must include, at a minimum, information and data about the number of participants; participant homelessness, employment, recidivism, and child support compliance; and job skills training provided to program participants. (mmm) $500,000 each year is for a grant to Pillsbury United Communities to provide job training and workforce development services for underserved communities. This is a onetime appropriation. (nnn) $500,000 each year is for a grant to Project for Pride in Living for job training and workforce development services for underserved communities. This is a onetime appropriation. (ooo) $300,000 each year is for a grant to YMCA of the North to provide career exploration, job training, and workforce development services for underserved youth and young adults. This is a onetime appropriation. (ppp) $500,000 each year is for a grant to Al Maa'uun, formerly the North at Work program, for a strategic intervention program designed to target and connect program participants to meaningful, sustainable living wage employment. This is a onetime appropriation. (qqq) $500,000 each year is for a grant to CAIRO to provide workforce development services in health care, technology, and transportation (CDL) industries. This is a onetime appropriation. (rrr) $500,000 each year is for a grant to the Central Minnesota Community Empowerment Organization for providing services to relieve economic disparities in the African immigrant community through workforce recruitment, development, job creation, assistance of smaller organizations to increase capacity, and outreach. Of this amount, up to five percent is for administration and monitoring of the program. This is a onetime appropriation. (sss) $270,000 each year is for a grant to the Stairstep Foundation for community-based workforce development efforts. This is a onetime appropriation. (ttt) $400,000 each year is for a grant to Building Strong Communities, Inc, for a statewide apprenticeship readiness program to prepare women, BIPOC community members, and veterans to enter the building and construction trades. This is a onetime appropriation. (uuu) $150,000 each year is for prevailing wage staff under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.871, subdivision 2. (vvv) $250,000 each year is for the purpose of awarding a grant to Minnesota Community of African People with Disabilities (MNCAPD), Roots Connect, and Fortune Relief and Youth Empowerment Organization (FRAYEO). This is a onetime appropriation. MNCAPD, Roots Connect, and FRAYEO must use grant proceeds to provide funding for workforce development activities for at-risk youth from low-income families and unengaged young adults experiencing disabilities, including: (1) job readiness training for at-risk youth, including resume building, interview skills, and job search strategies; (2) on-the-job training opportunities with local businesses; (3) support services such as transportation assistance and child care to help youth attend job training programs; and (4) mentorship and networking opportunities to connect youth with professionals in the youth's desired fields. (www)(1) $250,000 each year is for a grant to Greater Rochester Advocates for Universities and Colleges (GRAUC), a collaborative organization representing health care, business, workforce development, and higher education institutions, for expenses relating to starting up a state-of-the-art simulation center for training health care workers in southeast Minnesota. Once established, this center must be self-sustaining through user fees. Eligible expenses include leasing costs, developing and providing training, and operational costs. This is a onetime appropriation. (2) By January 15, 2025, GRAUC must submit a report, including an independent financial audit of the use of grant money, to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over higher education and economic development. This report must include details on the training provided at the simulation center, including the names of all organizations that use the center for training, the number of individuals each organization trained, and the type of training provided. (xxx)(1) $350,000 each year is for a grant to the Minnesota Association of Black Lawyers for a pilot program supporting black undergraduate students pursuing admission to law school. This is a onetime appropriation. (2) The program must: (i) enroll an initial cohort of ten to 20 black Minnesota resident students attending a baccalaureate degree-granting postsecondary institution in Minnesota full time; (ii) support each of the program's students with an academic scholarship in the amount of $4,000 per academic year; (iii) organize events and programming, including but not limited to one-on-one mentoring, to familiarize enrolled students with law school and legal careers; and (iv) provide the program's students free test preparation materials, academic support, and registration for the Law School Admission Test (LSAT) examination. (3) The Minnesota Association of Black Lawyers may use grant funds under clause (1) for costs related to: (i) student scholarships; (ii) academic events and programming, including food and transportation costs for students; (iii) LSAT preparation materials, courses, and registrations; and (iv) hiring staff for the program. (4) By January 30, 2024, and again by January 30, 2025, the Minnesota Association of Black Lawyers must submit a report to the commissioner and to the chairs and ranking minority members of legislative committees with jurisdiction over workforce development finance and policy and higher education finance and policy. The report must include an accurate and detailed account of the pilot program, its outcomes, and its revenues and expenses, including the use of all state funds appropriated in clause (1). (yyy) $2,000,000 the first year is for a grant to the Power of People Leadership Institute (POPLI) to expand pre- and post-release personal development and leadership training and community reintegration services, to reduce recidivism, and increase access to employment. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2025. (zzz) $500,000 the first year is to the Legislative Coordinating Commission for the Working Group on Youth Interventions. This is a onetime appropriation. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Laws 2023, chapter 53, article 21, section 7, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 120, article 1, section 12; and Laws 2024, chapter 125, article 8, section 9, is amended to read: Sec. 7. APPROPRIATIONS. (a) $50,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is appropriated from the Minnesota forward fund account to the commissioner of employment and economic development deleted text begin for providing businesses with matching funds required by federal programsdeleted text end . Money awarded under this program is made retroactive to February 1, 2023, for applications and projects. The commissioner may use up to two percent of this appropriation for administration. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until deleted text begin June 30, 2027deleted text end new text begin spentnew text end . deleted text begin Any funds that remain unspent are canceled to the general fund.deleted text end (b) $100,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is appropriated from the Minnesota forward fund account to the commissioner of employment and economic development to match existing federal funds made available in the Consolidated Appropriations Act, Public Law 117-328. This appropriation must be used to (1) construct and operate a bioindustrial manufacturing pilot innovation facility, biorefinery, or commercial campus utilizing agricultural feedstocks or (2) for a Minnesota aerospace center for research, development, and testing, or both (1) and (2). This appropriation is not subject to the grant limit requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8752, subdivisions 4, paragraph (b), and 5. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8752, subdivision 4, paragraph (a), this appropriation may include land acquisition as an eligible use to construct a bioindustrial manufacturing pilot innovation facility, a biorefinery, and an aerospace center for research, development, and testing. The commissioner may use up to two percent of this appropriation for administration. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until deleted text begin June 30, 2027deleted text end new text begin spentnew text end . deleted text begin Any funds that remain unspent are canceled to the general fund.deleted text end (c) $240,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is appropriated from the Minnesota forward fund account to the commissioner of employment and economic development to match federal funds made available in the Chips and Science Act, Public Law 117-167. Money awarded under this program is made retroactive to February 1, 2023, for applications and projects. This appropriation is not subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8752, subdivision 5. The commissioner may use up two percent for administration. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until deleted text begin June 30, 2027deleted text end new text begin spentnew text end . deleted text begin Any funds that remain unspent are canceled to the general fund.deleted text end (d) The commissioner may use the appropriation under paragraph (c) to allocate up to 15 percent of the total project cost with a maximum of $75,000,000 per project for the purpose of constructing, modernizing, or expanding commercial facilities on the front- and back-end fabrication of leading-edge, current-generation, and mature-node semiconductors; funding semiconductor materials and manufacturing equipment facilities; and for research and development facilities. (e) The commissioner may use the appropriation under paragraph (c) to award: (1) grants to institutions of higher education for developing and deploying training programs and to build pipelines to serve the needs of industry; and (2) grants to increase the capacity of institutions of higher education to serve industrial requirements for research and development that coincide with current and future requirements of projects eligible under this section. Grant money may be used to construct and equip facilities that serve the purpose of the industry. The maximum grant award per institution of higher education under this section is $5,000,000 and may not represent more than 50 percent of the total project funding from other sources. Use of this funding must be supported by businesses receiving funds under clause (1). (f) Money appropriated in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) may be transferred between appropriations within the Minnesota forward fund account by the commissioner of employment and economic development with approval of the commissioner of management and budget. The commissioner must notify the Legislative Advisory Commission at least 15 days prior to changing appropriations under this paragraph. Sec. 4. Laws 2023, chapter 64, article 15, section 30, is amended to read: Sec. 30. APPROPRIATION; CITY OF MINNEAPOLIS; GRANT. (a) $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of Minneapolis. This is a onetime appropriation. deleted text begin The grant must be paid by July 15, 2023.deleted text end The city of Minneapolis may use up to one percent of the grant for administrative costs.new text begin This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027.new text end (b) Of the amount granted to the city of Minneapolis under paragraph (a), $8,000,000 must be used for a grant to a foundation that provides business advising, branding and marketing support, and real estate consulting to businesses located on Lake Street in Minneapolis, between 30th Avenue South and Nicollet Avenue. The organization must use the funds for direct business support or direct corridor support, including assistance with marketing, placemaking, and public relations services. (c) Of the amount granted to the city of Minneapolis under paragraph (a), $2,000,000 must be used for property acquisition in the city of Minneapolis at 1860 28th Street East and 2717 Longfellow Avenue. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. Laws 2024, chapter 120, article 1, section 2, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Employment and Training Programs $ -0- $ 12,207,000 Appropriations by Fund 2024 2025 General -0- 50,000 Workforce Development -0- 12,157,000 (a) $400,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to Sabathani Community Center for specialized community outreach and engagement, a marketing and communication plan, program evaluation, personal empowerment training for men, empowerment and truancy curriculum for youth, wellness training for seniors, a workforce strategies mentorship and jobs training program, a 15-passenger van, and service kiosks for the Sabathani Community Center, including a onetime paid internship to support these programs. This is a onetime appropriation. (b) $700,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to the Shakopee Chamber Foundation for the Shakopee area workforce development scholarship pilot program. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. The commissioner of employment and economic development may enter into an interagency agreement with the Office of Higher Education, including agreements to transfer funds and to administer the program. (c) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to Inspire Change Clinic for their health care fellowship program designed to create pathways to medicine for high school and college students interested in pursuing a career in the health care workforce. The health care fellowship program is intended to remove barriers for minority students, foster inclusivity and diversity in the health care sector, and provide valuable opportunities for students, including mentorship programs, access to renowned health institutions in the state of Minnesota, and hands-on work experience. In addition to the reporting requirements in section 14, the commissioner must include the number of participants served by the grant and provide information about program outcomes. This is a onetime appropriation. (d) $250,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to Bolder Options Youth Mentoring Program to provide disadvantaged youth ages 12 to 22 with intensive one-to-one wellness, goal-setting, and academic-focused mentorship; programming that teaches life and job-seeking skills; career and college achievement coaches; and connections to employment, job training, and education opportunities. The grant must serve youth in the Bolder Options program in the Twin Cities and the city of Rochester. In addition to the reporting requirements in section 14, the commissioner must include the number of participants served by the grant. This is a onetime appropriation. (e) $1,000,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to Change Starts With Community for a violence prevention program. Grant money must be used to establish a comprehensive workforce development initiative, specifically tailored for at-risk youth and adults, located on site at Shiloh Cares Food Shelf in the city of Minneapolis. This is a onetime appropriation. (f) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to InspireMSP to develop programming to assist middle school-aged children in Minneapolis and St. Paul to develop an interest in and connect with the creative industry in Minnesota. Money must be used for program development and career exploration in the creative industry for historically excluded youth by providing access to essential resources, networks, and hands-on experience. This is a onetime appropriation. (g) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to Lake County Ambulance Service to establish a training program for Cook County and Lake County high school students interested in pursuing careers as emergency medical technicians. This is a onetime appropriation. (h) $350,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to the city of Austin to develop and implement training programs for water operators and wastewater operators. Riverland Community College must offer the training programs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. Of this amount, the city of Austin may use up to five percent for administration of the program. The commissioner must provide an annual report by January 5 of each year until January 5, 2028, regarding the use of grant funds under this paragraph to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development and higher education. The report must include the number of students enrolled and number of students who have completed courses funded by this appropriation. (i) $250,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to the Greater Minneapolis Council of Churches for a STEM training and career preparation program targeted at the needs of BIPOC youth. The program shall serve youth who are at least 11 years of age and less than 24 years of age and shall provide career training, job skills development, mentorship, and employment opportunities. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (j) $200,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to the Jobs Foundation for direct training, support services, safety enhancements, and economic support for formerly incarcerated individuals participating in the Repowered work readiness program. This is a onetime appropriation. (k) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to the North Minneapolis Pet Resource Center, also known as Mypitbullisfamilycom.Inc, Community Animal Medicine Professionals (CAMP) program to provide training, professional development workshops, mentorship and leadership programs, and develop recruitment and retention strategies. This is a onetime appropriation. (l) $1,000,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to African Immigrants Community Services for workforce development for new Americans. This is a onetime appropriation. (m) $1,000,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to WomenVenture for supporting child care providers by providing business training, mentorship, services, and educational materials, by facilitating shared administrative staff and pooled management of services such as banking and payroll, by providing child care management software and software training, and by distributing subgrants and loans, which may be forgivable at WomenVenture's discretion. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (n) $1,000,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to the Black Chamber of Commerce for technical support to Black-owned small businesses, for implementing initiatives to address barriers facing the Black business community, and for networking, mentorship, and training programs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (o) $250,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to the Karen Organization of Minnesota for job training and financial support and incentives for job training participants. This is a onetime appropriation. (p) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Indigenous Roots for soft skills training and career readiness training for youth. This is a onetime appropriation. (q) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Ramsey County for a subgrant with People in Action to provide workforce development programming. This amount is available until June 30, 2026, and 40 percent of the amount must be expended within the city of St. Paul. Grants provided by People in Action must be awarded through at least two requests for proposals. This is a onetime appropriation. (r) $500,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to the Metro Youth Diversion Center to support its Youth-Care Assessment and Readiness Education program to enhance workforce development opportunities for youth with a focus on underrepresented East African students. This is a onetime appropriation. (s) $174,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Independent School District No. 709, Duluth, for a software subscription to facilitate the career planning of students. This is a onetime appropriation. (t) $171,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Independent School District No. 704, Proctor, to develop a regional career and technical education program to serve Independent School District No. 704, Proctor, Independent School District No. 700, Hermantown, and Independent School District No. 99, Esko. This is a onetime appropriation. (u) $1,000,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to the city of Brooklyn Park for the Brooklyn Park Small Business Center and for the city to expand the workforce development programming of Brooklyn Park and Brooklyn Center through workforce development programs serving primarily underrepresented populations, including such programs as Brooklynk, Career Pathways, Youth Entrepreneurship, and Community Partnership. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (v) $500,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Riverside Plaza Tenant Association to address employment, economic, and technology access disparities for low-income unemployed or underemployed individuals through training in health care, technology, and construction or skilled trades industries. This is a onetime appropriation. (w) $300,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to African Career, Education, and Resources, Inc., to develop a program for health care skills training and computer skills training in collaboration with the Organization of Liberians in Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation. (x) $75,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Equitable Development Action for it to fund programs and provide technical assistance to underserved businesses. This is a onetime appropriation. (y) $50,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to HIRPHA International for use on youth apprenticeships, entrepreneurship training, computer skills, and work readiness training. This is a onetime appropriation. (z) $200,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to YWCA St. Paul for a strategic intervention program designed to target and connect program participants to meaningful, sustainable living wage employment. This is a onetime appropriation. (aa) $50,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to United Senior Lao American Association to provide job and skills training for an underserved population. This is a onetime appropriation. (bb) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Hmong American Farmers Association for workforce readiness, employment exploration, and skills development. This is a onetime appropriation. (cc) $240,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to MN Zej Zog for workforce readiness, employment exploration, and skills development. This is a onetime appropriation. (dd) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Ramsey County for a Justice Impact Navigator to support Ramsey County residents who have a justice impact or who are reentering the community after incarceration to connect to resources with a focus on employment and training supports. Funds must be used for a navigator pilot and other administrative expenses such as outreach, marketing, and resources for residents. This is a onetime appropriation. (ee) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Ramsey County for a Digital Equity Specialist to support Ramsey County residents with digital literacy resources and skills to connect to employment and training supports. Funds must be used for a digital navigator pilot serving in Ramsey County Career Labs and community-based locations and other administrative expenses, such as outreach, marketing, and resources for residents. This is a onetime appropriation. (ff) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to Film North to attract a film festival. This is a onetime appropriation. The commissioner of employment and economic development may enter into an interagency agreement with Explore Minnesota, including agreements to transfer funds and administer the grant. (gg) $400,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to the Twin Cities Urban League for support, capacity building, and expansion of the Work Readiness Program. This is a onetime appropriation. (hh) $500,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to Arrowhead Opportunity Agency for the purposes of expanding workforce development opportunities deleted text begin in the regiondeleted text end new text begin through the creation of a regional hub building where services can be providednew text end . new text begin Money may be used for the costs of acquiring and refurbishing a building to serve as the hub. new text end This is a onetime appropriationnew text begin and is available until June 30, 2026new text end . (ii) $597,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to the Minneapolis Downtown Council for infrastructure and associated costs for the Taste of Minnesota event, including but not limited to buildout, permits, garbage services, staffing, security, equipment rentals, signage, and insurance. This is a onetime appropriation. The commissioner of employment and economic development may enter into an interagency agreement with Explore Minnesota, including agreements to transfer funds and administer the grant. (jj) $50,000 the second year is from the general fund for a grant to Block Builders Foundation. This appropriation must be used for programming targeted toward at-risk youth coaching, financial literacy education, juvenile offender diversion programming, and community outreach. This is a onetime appropriation. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after final enactment. new text end Sec. 6. Laws 2024, chapter 120, article 1, section 4, is amended to read: Sec. 4. EXPLORE MINNESOTA $ -0- $ 4,475,000 (a) $825,000 the second year is for Explore Minnesota Film. This appropriation is added to the Explore MN base in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter. (b) $400,000 the second year is for deleted text begin a grant to Ka Joog fordeleted text end Somali community and cultural festivals and events, including festivals and events in greater Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriationnew text begin and is available until June 30, 2026new text end . (c) $2,000,000 the second year is for a grant to the 2026 Special Olympics USA Games to expend on providing food and housing to 2026 Special Olympics USA Games athletes. This is a onetime appropriation. (d) $1,250,000 the second year is for a grant to the Minneapolis Downtown Council for infrastructure and associated costs for the Taste of Minnesota event, including but not limited to buildout, permits, garbage services, staffing, security, equipment rentals, signage, and insurance. This is a onetime appropriation. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin The section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 7. Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 14, section 3, is amended to read: Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY $ -0- $ 225,000 This appropriation is for the single-egress stairway apartment building report under article 15, section 46. This is a onetime appropriationnew text begin and is available until June 30, 2026new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin APPROPRIATION CANCELLATION; JOB CREATION FUND.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 of the appropriation in fiscal year 2025 from the general fund as appropriated under Laws 2023, chapter 53, article 20, section 2, subdivision 2, paragraph (q), is canceled to the general fund. This is a onetime cancellation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Laws 2024, chapter 120, article 1, section 13, new text end new text begin is repealed retroactively from July 1, 2024. new text end ARTICLE 3 DEED POLICY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116J.431, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Eligible projects. (a) An economic development project for which a county or city may be eligible to receive a grant under this section includes: (1) manufacturing; (2) technology; (3) warehousing and distribution; (4) research and development; (5) agricultural processing, defined as transforming, packaging, sorting, or grading livestock or livestock products new text begin or plants and plant-based products new text end into goods that are used for intermediate or final consumption, including goods for nonfood use; or (6) industrial park development that would be used by any other business listed in this subdivision even if no business has committed to locate in the industrial park at the time the grant application is made. (b) Up to 15 percent of the development of a project may be for a purpose that is not included under this subdivision as an eligible project. A city or county must provide notice to the commissioner for the commissioner's approval of the proposed project. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116J.8733, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. deleted text begin Revolving loan funddeleted text end new text begin Minnesota expanding opportunity accountnew text end . (a) deleted text begin The commissioner shall establish a revolving loan fund to make loans to nonprofit corporations, Tribal economic development entities, and community development financial institutions for the purpose of increasing nonprofit corporation, Tribal economic development entity, and community development financial institution capital and lending activities with Minnesota small businesses.deleted text end new text begin A Minnesota expanding opportunity account is created in the special revenue fund in the state treasury. Money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner for revolving loans to nonprofit corporations for the purpose of increasing nonprofit corporation capital and lending activities with Minnesota small businesses.new text end (b) Nonprofit corporationsdeleted text begin , Tribal economic development entities, and community development financial institutionsdeleted text end that receive loans from the commissioner under the program must establish appropriate accounting practices for the purpose of tracking eligible loans. new text begin (c) All loan repayments must be paid into the Minnesota expanding opportunity account created in this section to fund additional loans. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116J.8752, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Purpose. The Minnesota forward fund account is created to increase the state's competitiveness by providing the state the authority and flexibility to facilitate private investment. The fund serves as a closing fund to allow the authority and flexibility to negotiate incentives to better compete with other states for business retention, expansion and attraction of projects in existing and new industries, new text begin and new text end develop properties for business usedeleted text begin , and leverage to meet matching requirements of federal fundingdeleted text end for resiliency in economic security and economic enhancement opportunities that provide the public high-quality employment opportunities. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116L.03, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Appointment. The Minnesota Job Skills Partnership Board consists of: seven members appointed by the governor, the commissioner of employment and economic developmentnew text begin or the commissioner's designeenew text end , the chancellor, or the chancellor's designee, of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities, the president, or the president's designee, of the University of Minnesota, and two nonlegislator members, one appointed by the Subcommittee on Committees of the senate Committee on Rules and Administration and one appointed by the speaker of the house. If the chancellor or the president of the university makes a designation under this subdivision, the designee must have experience in technical education. Four of the appointed members must be members of the governor's Workforce Development Board, of whom two must represent organized labor and two must represent business and industry. One of the appointed members must be a representative of a nonprofit organization that provides workforce development or job training services. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116L.04, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Partnership program. (a) The partnership program may provide grants-in-aid to educational or other nonprofit educational institutions using the following guidelines: (1) the educational or other nonprofit educational institution is a provider of training within the state in either the public or private sector; (2) the program involves skills training that is an area of employment need; and (3) preference will be given to educational or other nonprofit training institutions which serve economically disadvantaged people, minorities, or those who are victims of economic dislocation and to businesses located in rural areas. (b) A single grant to any one institution shall not exceed deleted text begin $400,000deleted text end new text begin $500,000new text end . A portion of a grant may be used for preemployment training. (c) Each institution must provide for the dissemination of summary results of a grant-funded project, including, but not limited to, information about curriculum and all supporting materials developed in conjunction with the grant. Results of projects developed by any Minnesota State Colleges and Universities system institution must be disseminated throughout the system. new text begin (d) At the discretion of the board, higher education institutions may charge up to a 15-percent increase on the direct project costs, not including equipment costs. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116L.04, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Pathways program. new text begin (a) new text end The pathways program may provide grants-in-aid for developing programs which assist in the transition of persons from welfare to work and assist individuals at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines. The program is to be operated by the board. The board shall consult and coordinate with program administrators at the Department of Employment and Economic Development to design and provide services for temporary assistance for needy families recipients. new text begin (b) new text end Pathways grants-in-aid may be awarded to educational or other nonprofit training institutions or to workforce development intermediaries for education and training programs and services supporting education and training programs that serve eligible recipients. Preference shall be given to projects that: (1) provide employment with benefits paid to employees; (2) provide employment where there are defined career paths for trainees; (3) pilot the development of an educational pathway that can be used on a continuing basis for transitioning persons from welfare to work; and (4) demonstrate the active participation of Department of Employment and Economic Development workforce centers, Minnesota State College and University institutions and other educational institutions, and local welfare agencies. new text begin (c) new text end Pathways projects must demonstrate the active involvement and financial commitment of a participating business. Pathways projects must be matched with cash or in-kind contributions on at least a one-half-to-one ratio by a participating business. new text begin (d) new text end A single grant to any one institution shall not exceed deleted text begin $400,000deleted text end new text begin $500,000new text end . A portion of a grant may be used for preemployment training. new text begin (e) At the discretion of the board, higher education institutions may charge up to a 15-percent increase on the direct project costs, not including equipment costs. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116L.05, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Use of workforce development funds. After deleted text begin Marchdeleted text end new text begin Septembernew text end 1 of any fiscal year, the board may use workforce development funds for the purposes outlined in sections 116L.02 and 116L.04, or to provide incumbent worker training services under section 116L.18 if the following conditions have been met: (1) the board examines relevant economic indicators, including the projected number of layoffs for the remainder of the fiscal year and the next fiscal year, evidence of declining and expanding industries, the number of initial applications for and the number of exhaustions of unemployment benefits, job vacancy data, and any additional relevant information brought to the board's attention; (2) the board accounts for all allocations made in section 116L.17, subdivision 2; (3) based on the past expenditures and projected revenue, the board estimates future funding needs for services under section 116L.17 for the remainder of the current fiscal year and the next fiscal year; (4) the board determines there will be unspent funds after meeting the needs of dislocated workers in the current fiscal year and there will be sufficient revenue to meet the needs of dislocated workers in the next fiscal year; and (5) the board reports its findings in clauses (1) to (4) to the chairs of legislative committees with jurisdiction over the workforce development fund, to the commissioners of revenue and management and budget, and to the public. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116L.562, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Establishment. The commissioner shall award grants to eligible organizations for the purpose of providing workforce development and training opportunitiesnew text begin or preemployment services and mentorship opportunitiesnew text end to economically disadvantaged or at-risk youth ages 14 to 24. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116L.562, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Competitive grant awards. (a) In awarding competitive grants, priority shall be given to programs that: (1) provide students with information about education and training requirements for careers in high-growth, in-demand occupations; (2) serve youth from communities of color who are underrepresented in the workforce; or (3) serve youth with disabilities. (b) Eligible organizations must have demonstrated effectiveness in administering youth deleted text begin workforcedeleted text end programs and must leverage nonstate or private sector funds. (c) New eligible applicants must be youth-serving organizations with significant capacity and demonstrable youth development experience and outcomes to operate deleted text begin a youth workforce developmentdeleted text end new text begin an eligiblenew text end project. (d) If a program is not operated by a local unit of government or a workforce development board, the grant recipient must coordinate the program with the local workforce development board. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116L.98, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Definitions. (a) For the purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. (b) "Credential" means deleted text begin postsecondarydeleted text end degrees, diplomas, licenses, and certificates awarded in recognition of an individual's attainment of measurable technical or occupational skills necessary to obtain employment or advance with an occupation. This definition does not include certificates awarded by workforce investment boards or work-readiness certificates. (c) "Exit" means to have not received service under a workforce program for 90 consecutive calendar days. The exit date is the last date of service. (d) "Net impact" means the use of matched control groups and regression analysis to estimate the impacts attributable to program participation net of other factors, including observable personal characteristics and economic conditions. (e) "Pre-enrollment" means the period of time before an individual was enrolled in a workforce program. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116U.05, is amended to read: 116U.05 EXPLORE MINNESOTAnew text begin ; ESTABLISHMENTnew text end . Explore Minnesota is an office in the executive branch with a director appointed by the governor. The director is under the supervision of the commissioner of employment and economic development and oversees Explore Minnesota Tourism deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end Explore Minnesota for Businessnew text begin , and Explore Minnesota Filmnew text end divisions. The director serves in the unclassified service and must be qualified by experience and training in related fields. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116U.06, is amended to read: 116U.06 EXPLORE MINNESOTA TOURISM. Explore Minnesota Tourism deleted text begin is a division of Explore Minnesota anddeleted text end exists to support Minnesota's economy through promotion and facilitation of travel to and within the state of Minnesota. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116U.15, is amended to read: 116U.15 MISSION. (a) The mission of Explore Minnesota is to deleted text begin promote and facilitate increased travel to and within the state of Minnesota, promote overall livability, and promote workforce and economic opportunity in Minnesotadeleted text end new text begin support the growth of Minnesota's economy through the management of the state's tourism, livability and economic opportunity, outdoor recreation, film, and other statewide promotion efforts as directednew text end . To further the mission of Explore Minnesota, the office is advised by new text begin various advisory new text end councils deleted text begin focused on tourism and talent attraction and business marketingdeleted text end . Its goals are to: (1) expand public and private partnerships through increased interagency efforts and increased tourism and business industry participation; (2) increase productivity through enhanced flexibility and options; and (3) use innovative fiscal and human resource practices to manage the state's resources and operate the office as efficiently as possible. (b) The director shall report to the legislature on the performance of the office's operations and the accomplishment of its goals in the office's biennial budget according to section 16A.10, subdivision 1. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116U.30, is amended to read: 116U.30 DUTIES OF DIRECTOR. (a) The director shall: (1) publish, disseminate, and distribute informational and promotional materials; (2) promote and encourage the coordination of new text begin Explore new text end Minnesota deleted text begin travel, tourism, overall livability, and workforce and economic opportunitydeleted text end promotion efforts with other state agencies and develop multiagency marketing strategies when appropriate; (3) promote and encourage the expansion and development of deleted text begin international tourism, trade, and Minnesota livability marketingdeleted text end new text begin programs that support the mission of the officenew text end ; (4) advertise and disseminate information about deleted text begin Minnesota travel, tourism, and workforce and economic development opportunitiesdeleted text end new text begin Explore Minnesota and its activities that support the mission of the officenew text end ; (5) deleted text begin aid variousdeleted text end new text begin providenew text end local communities new text begin a reasonable level of support new text end to improve their deleted text begin travel, tourism, and overall livabilitydeleted text end marketing programsnew text begin as they relate to the mission of the officenew text end ; (6) coordinate and implement comprehensive state deleted text begin travel, tourism, workforce and economic development, and overall livabilitydeleted text end new text begin mission-drivennew text end marketing programs that take into consideration public and private businesses and attractions; (7) contract, in accordance with section 16C.08, for professional services if the work or services cannot be satisfactorily performed by employees of the agency or by any other state agency; (8) provide local, regional, and statewide organizations with information, deleted text begin technical assistancedeleted text end new text begin educational opportunitiesnew text end , training, and advice on deleted text begin using state tourism and livability information anddeleted text end new text begin promotionalnew text end programsnew text begin related to the office's missionnew text end ; and (9) generally gather, compile, and make available statistical information relating to deleted text begin Minnesota travel, tourism, workforce and economic development, overall livability, and related areas in this statedeleted text end new text begin the office's missionnew text end . The director has the authority to call upon other state agencies for statistical data and results obtained by them and to arrange and compile that statistical information. (b) The director may: (1) apply for, receive, and spend money deleted text begin for travel, tourism, workforce and economic development, and overall livability development and marketingdeleted text end new text begin , as it relates to the mission of the office,new text end from other agencies, organizations, and businesses; (2) apply for, accept, and disburse grants and other aids for deleted text begin tourismdeleted text end development and marketing from the federal government and other sources; (3) enter into joint powers or cooperative agreements with agencies of the federal government, local governmental units, regional development commissions, other state agencies, the University of Minnesota and other educational institutions, other states, Canadian provinces, and local, statewide, and regional organizations as necessary to perform the director's duties; (4) enter into interagency agreements and agree to share net revenues with the contributing agencies; (5) make grants; (6) conduct market research and analysis to improve marketing techniques deleted text begin in the area of travel, tourism, workforce and economic development, and overall livabilitydeleted text end ; (7) monitor and study trends in the related industries and provide resources and training to address change; (8) annually convene conferences of Minnesota providers for the purposes of exchanging information on tourism development, coordinating marketing activities, and formulating deleted text begin tourism, overall livability, and workforce and economic opportunitydeleted text end new text begin mission-relatednew text end promotion development strategies; and (9) enter into promotion contracts or other agreements with private persons and public entities, including agreements to establish and maintain offices and other types of representation in foreign countries to promote international travel and to implement this chapter. (c) Contracts for goods and deleted text begin nonprofessionaldeleted text end new text begin services and professionalnew text end technical services made under paragraph (b), clauses (3) and (9), are not subject to the provisions of sections 16C.03, subdivision 3, and 16C.06 concerning competitive bidding and section 16C.055 concerning barter arrangements. new text begin Professional technical service new text end contracts new text begin that promote Minnesota as a tourism travel destination or a talent attraction new text end may be negotiated and are not subject to the provisions of chapter 16C relating to competitive bidding. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116U.35, is amended to read: 116U.35 PROMOTIONAL EXPENSES. To promote deleted text begin travel, tourism, workforce and economic development, and overall livability of the statedeleted text end new text begin programs that align with Explore Minnesota's missionnew text end , the director may expend money appropriated by the legislature for these purposes in the same manner as private persons, firms, corporations, and associations make expenditures for these purposes. Policies on promotional expenses must be approved by the commissioner of administration. A policy for expenditures on food, lodging, and travel must be approved by the commissioner of management and budget. No money may be expended for the appearance in radio or television broadcasts by an elected public official. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 248.07, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Blind, vending deleted text begin stands and machinesdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end on governmental property; liability limited. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the rehabilitation of blind persons the commissioner shall have exclusive authority to establish and to operate vending deleted text begin stands and vending machinesdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end in all buildings and properties owned or rented exclusively by the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities at a state university, a community college, a consolidated community technical college, or a technical college served by the commissioner before January 1, 1996, or by any department or agency of the state of Minnesota except the Department of Natural Resources properties operated directly by the Division of State Parks and not subject to private leasing. Vending deleted text begin stands and machinesdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end authorized under this subdivision may dispense nonalcoholic beverages, food, candies, tobacco, souvenirs, notions, and related items and must be operated on the same basis as other vending deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end for the blind established and supervised by the commissioner under federal law. The commissioner shall waive this authority to displace any present private individual concessionaire in any state-owned or rented building or property who is operating under a contract with a specific renewal or termination date, until the renewal or termination date. With the consent of the governing body of a governmental subdivision of the state, the commissioner may establish and supervise vending deleted text begin stands and vending machinesdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end for the blind in any building or property exclusively owned or rented by the governmental subdivision. (b) The Department of Employment and Economic Development is not liable under chapter 176 for any injury sustained by a blind vendor's employee or agent. The Department of Employment and Economic Development, its officers, and its agents are not liable for the acts or omissions of a blind vendor or of a blind vendor's employee or agent that may result in the blind vendor's liability to third parties. The Department of Employment and Economic Development, its officers, and its agents are not liable for negligence based on any theory of liability for claims arising from the relationship created under this subdivision with the blind vendor. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 248.07, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Use of revolving fund, licenses for operation of vending deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end . (a) The revolving fund created by Laws 1947, chapter 535, section 5, is continued as provided in this subdivision and shall be known as the revolving fund for vocational rehabilitation of the blind. It shall be used for the purchase of equipment and supplies for establishing and operating of vending deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end by blind persons. All income, receipts, earnings, and federal vending deleted text begin machinedeleted text end new text begin facilitynew text end income due to the operation of vending deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end operated under this subdivision shall also be paid into the fund. All interest earned on money accrued in the fund must be credited to the fund by the commissioner of management and budget. All equipment, supplies, and expenses for setting up these deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end shall be paid for from the fund. (b) The commissioner is authorized to use the money available in the revolving fund that originated as operational charges to individuals licensed under this subdivision for the establishment, operation, and supervision of vending deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end by blind persons for the following purposes: (1) purchase, upkeep and replacement of equipment; (2) expenses incidental to the setting up of new deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end and improvement of old deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end ; (3) reimbursement under section 15.059 to individual blind vending operators for reasonable expenses incurred in attending supervisory meetings as called by the commissioner and other expenditures for management services consistent with federal law; and (4) purchase of fringe benefits for blind vending operators and their employees such as group health insurance, retirement program, vacation or sick leave assistance provided that the purchase of any fringe benefit is approved by a majority vote of blind vending operators licensed pursuant to this subdivision after the commissioner provides to each blind vending operator information on all matters relevant to the fringe benefits. "Majority vote" means a majority of blind vending operators voting. Fringe benefits shall be paid only from assessments of operators for specific benefits, gifts to the fund for fringe benefit purposes, and vending income which is not assignable to an individual deleted text begin standdeleted text end new text begin facilitynew text end . (c) Money originally deposited as merchandise and supplies repayments by individuals licensed under this subdivision may be expended for initial and replacement stocks of supplies and merchandise. Money originally deposited from vending income on federal property must be spent consistent with federal law. (d) All other deposits may be used for the purchase of general liability insurance or any other expense related to the operation and supervision of vending deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end . (e) The commissioner shall issue each license for the operation of a vending deleted text begin standdeleted text end new text begin facilitynew text end or vending machine for an indefinite period but may terminate any license in the manner provided. In granting licenses for new or vacated deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end preference on the basis of seniority of experience in operating deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end under the control of the commissioner shall be given to capable operators who are deemed competent to handle the enterprise under consideration. Application of this preference shall not prohibit the commissioner from selecting an operator from the community in which the deleted text begin standdeleted text end new text begin facilitynew text end is located. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 469.54, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Credit for parking revenue. (a) By March 1 of the year following the year in which the parking facilities or structures are constructed within the district, the city must certify to the commissioner: (1) the total amount of revenue generated by the parking facilities and structures in the preceding year; and (2) the total amount necessary for operational and maintenance expenses of the facilities or structures in the deleted text begin currentdeleted text end new text begin precedingnew text end year. (b) By July 1 of each year thereafter, for a period of 25 years, the commissioner must confirm or revise the amounts as reported. An amount equal to 50 percent of the amount of revenue received by the city by the parking structures and facilities in the deleted text begin previousdeleted text end new text begin precedingnew text end year that is greater than the amount necessary for operational and maintenance expenses of the facilities or structures in the deleted text begin currentdeleted text end new text begin precedingnew text end year must be paid by the city to the commissioner of employment and economic development by September 1 for deposit into the general fund. Sec. 19. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 116L.35; and 116L.98, subdivision 7, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end ARTICLE 4 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY POLICY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 177.27, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Civil actions. The commissioner may bring an action in the district court where an employer resides or where the commissioner maintains an office to enforce or require compliance with orders issued under subdivision 4.new text begin In addition to any other remedy provided by law, the commissioner may also apply in the district court where an employer resides or where the commissioner maintains an office for an order enjoining and restraining violations of any statute or rule listed in subdivision 4.new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.211, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Nursing home. "Nursing home" means a nursing home licensed under chapter 144Anew text begin and reimbursed under chapter 256Rnew text end , or a boarding care home licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.56new text begin and reimbursed under chapter 256Rnew text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.211, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Nursing home employer. "Nursing home employer" means an employer of nursing home workers in a deleted text begin licensed, Medicaid-certified facility that is reimbursed under chapter deleted text end deleted text begin 256Rdeleted text end new text begin nursing home as defined under subdivision 7new text end . Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.988, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Covenants not to compete void and unenforceable. (a) Any covenant not to compete contained in a contract or agreement is void and unenforceable. (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), a covenant not to compete is valid and enforceable if: new text begin (1) the covenant not to compete restricts an employee from engaging in competition for no more than one year and the employee received a clear, written explanation of the covenant not to compete prior to entering into the contract or agreement, and either: new text end new text begin (i) the employee has a salary of $200,000 or more and whose primary duties include: new text end new text begin (A) research and development or the creation, analysis, or modification of confidential, proprietary, or trade secret information; or new text end new text begin (B) management of a project, team, or department with responsibility over research and development or the creation, analysis, or modification of confidential, proprietary, or trade secret information; or new text end new text begin (ii) the employee has a salary of $500,000 or more regardless of the employee's primary job duties; new text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end the covenant not to compete is agreed upon during the sale of a business. The person selling the business and the partners, members, or shareholders, and the buyer of the business may agree on a temporary and geographically restricted covenant not to compete that will prohibit the seller of the business from carrying on a similar business within a reasonable geographic area and for a reasonable length of time; or deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the covenant not to compete is agreed upon in anticipation of the dissolution of a business. The partners, members, or shareholders, upon or in anticipation of a dissolution of a partnership, limited liability company, or corporation may agree that all or any number of the parties will not carry on a similar business within a reasonable geographic area where the business has been transacted. (c) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to render void or unenforceable any other provisions in a contract or agreement containing a void or unenforceable covenant not to compete. (d) In addition to injunctive relief and any other remedies available, a court may award an employee who is enforcing rights under this section reasonable attorney fees. new text begin (e) For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "trade secret" means all forms and types of scientific, technical, or engineering information, including patterns, plans, compilations, program devices, formulas, designs, prototypes, methods, techniques, processes, procedures, programs, or codes; whether tangible or intangible, and whether or how stored, compiled, or memorialized physically, electronically, graphically, photographically, or in writing, if: new text end new text begin (1) the owner thereof has taken reasonable measures to keep such information secret; and new text end new text begin (2) the information derives independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to, and not being readily ascertainable through proper means by, another person who can obtain economy value from the disclosure or use of the information. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.0981, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Internet continuing education. (a) The design and delivery of an Internet continuing education course must be approved by the International Distance Education Certification Center (IDECC) or the International deleted text begin Associationdeleted text end new text begin Accreditorsnew text end for Continuing Education and Training (IACET) before the course is submitted for the commissioner's approval. The approval must accompany the course submitted. (b) Paragraphs (a) and (d) do not apply to approval of an Internet continuing education course for manufactured home installers. An Internet continuing education course for manufactured home installers must be approved by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development or by the commissioner of labor and industry. The approval must accompany the course completion certificate issued to each student by the course sponsor. (c) Paragraph (a) does not apply to approval of an Internet continuing education course for elevator constructors. An Internet continuing education course for elevator constructors must be approved by the commissioner of labor and industry. The approval must accompany the course completion certificate issued to each student by the course sponsor. (d) An Internet continuing education course must: (1) specify the minimum computer system requirements; (2) provide encryption that ensures that all personal information, including the student's name, address, and credit card number, cannot be read as it passes across the Internet; (3) include technology to guarantee seat time; (4) include a high level of interactivity; (5) include graphics that reinforce the content; (6) include the ability for the student to contact an instructor or course sponsor within a reasonable amount of time; (7) include the ability for the student to get technical support within a reasonable amount of time; (8) include a statement that the student's information will not be sold or distributed to any third party without prior written consent of the student. Taking the course does not constitute consent; (9) be available 24 hours a day, seven days a week, excluding minimal downtime for updating and administration, except that this provision does not apply to live courses taught by an actual instructor and delivered over the Internet; (10) provide viewing access to the online course at all times to the commissioner, excluding minimal downtime for updating and administration; (11) include a process to authenticate the student's identity; (12) inform the student and the commissioner how long after its purchase a course will be accessible; (13) inform the student that license education credit will not be awarded for taking the course after it loses its status as an approved course; (14) provide clear instructions on how to navigate through the course; (15) provide automatic bookmarking at any point in the course; (16) provide questions after each unit or chapter that must be answered before the student can proceed to the next unit or chapter; (17) include a reinforcement response when a quiz question is answered correctly; (18) include a response when a quiz question is answered incorrectly; (19) include a final examination in which the student must correctly answer 70 percent of the questions; (20) allow the student to go back and review any unit at any time, except during the final examination; (21) provide a course evaluation at the end of the course. At a minimum, the evaluation must ask the student to report any difficulties caused by the online education delivery method; (22) provide a completion certificate when the course and exam have been completed and the provider has verified the completion. Electronic certificates are sufficient and shall include the name of the provider, date and location of the course, educational program identification that was provided by the department, hours of instruction or continuing education hours, and licensee's or attendee's name and license, certification, or registration number or the last four digits of the licensee's or attendee's Social Security number; and (23) allow the commissioner the ability to electronically review the class to determine if credit can be approved. (e) The final examination must be either an encrypted online examination or a paper examination that is monitored by a proctor who certifies that the student took the examination. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.198, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Installation requirements. (a) The installation of underground telecommunications infrastructure that is located within ten feet of existing underground utilities or that crosses the existing underground utilities must be performed by safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers as follows: (1) the location of existing utilities by hand- or hydro-excavation or other accepted methods must be performed by a safety-qualified underground telecommunications installer;new text begin andnew text end (2) where telecommunications infrastructure is installed by means of directional drilling, the monitoring of the location and depth of the drill head must be performed by a safety-qualified underground telecommunications installerdeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (3) no fewer than two safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers must be present at all times at any location where telecommunications infrastructure is being installed by means of directional drilling. deleted text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end deleted text begin Beginning July 1, 2025, all installations of underground telecommunications infrastructure subject to this subdivision within the seven-county metropolitan area must be performed by safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers that meet the requirements of this subdivisiondeleted text end deleted text begin .deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end Beginning January 1, 2026, all installations of underground telecommunications infrastructure subject to this subdivision within this state must be performed by safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers that meet the requirements of this subdivision. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.198, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Certification Standards. (a) The commissioner of labor and industry, in consultation with the Office of Broadband, shall approve standards for a safety-qualified underground telecommunications installer certification program that requires a person to: (1) complete a 40-hour initial course that includes classroom and hands-on instruction covering proper work procedures for safe installation of underground utilities, including: (i) regulations applicable to excavation near existing utilities; (ii) identification, location, and verification of utility lines using hand- or hydro-excavation or other accepted methods; (iii) response to line strike incidents; (iv) traffic control procedures; (v) use of a tracking device to safely guide directional drill equipment along a drill path; and (vi) avoidance and mitigation of safety hazards posed by underground utility installation projects; (2) demonstrate knowledge of the course material by successfully completing an examination approved by the commissioner; and (3) complete a four-hour refresher course within three years of completing the original course and every three years thereafter in order to maintain certification. (b) The commissioner must develop an approval process for training providers under this subdivision and may suspend or revoke the approval of any training provider that fails to demonstrate consistent delivery of approved curriculum or success in preparing participants to complete the examination. new text begin (c) An approved training provider may apply for approval of classroom instruction course material delivered up to two years prior to becoming an approved training provider and before January 1, 2026, as being equivalent or substantially equivalent to classroom instruction course material that is contained in the approved program. An application must provide a copy of all written materials used for the training for which equivalent credit is sought, the specific subjects covered in the training, the name and qualifications of the training provider, a description of the delivery method for the training, and the date of the training. Once approved, a training provider may grant full or partial retroactive credit for completion of classroom instruction training delivered prior to the commissioner's decision to approve a program. A person granted retroactive credit must successfully complete the examination that the training provider is approved to administer in order to be certified as a safety-qualified underground telecommunications installer. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.31, subdivision 29, is amended to read: Subd. 29. Technology circuits or systems. "Technology circuits or systems" means class 2 deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end class 3new text begin , or class 4new text end circuits or systems for, but not limited to, remote control, signaling, control, alarm, and audio signal, including associated components as covered by the National Electrical Code, deleted text begin articles 640, 645, 650, 725, 760, 770, and 780,deleted text end and which are isolated from circuits or systems other than class 2 deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end class 3new text begin , or class 4new text end by a demarcation and are not process control circuits or systems; antenna and communication circuits or systems as covered by deleted text begin chapter 8 ofdeleted text end the National Electrical Code; and circuitry and equipment deleted text begin for indoor lighting and outdoor landscape lighting systems that are supplied by the secondary circuit of an isolating power supply operating at 30 volts or less asdeleted text end new text begin for low-voltage lighting, limited to a class 2 or class 3 power supplynew text end covered by the new text begin Low-Voltage Lighting article in the new text end National Electrical Codedeleted text begin , article 411deleted text end . The planning, laying out, installing, altering, and repairing of technology circuits or systems must be performed in accordance with the applicable requirements of the National Electrical Code pursuant to section 326B.35. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.33, subdivision 21, is amended to read: Subd. 21. Exemptions from licensing. (a) An individual who is a maintenance electrician is not required to hold or obtain a license under sections 326B.31 to 326B.399 if: (1) the individual is engaged in the maintenance and repair of electrical equipment, apparatus, and facilities that are owned or leased by the individual's employer and that are located within the limits of property operated, maintained, and either owned or leased by the individual's employer; (2) the individual is supervised by: (i) the responsible master electrician for a contractor who has contracted with the individual's employer to provide services for which a contractor's license is required; or (ii) a licensed master electrician, a licensed maintenance electrician, an electrical engineer, or, if the maintenance and repair work is limited to technology circuits or systems work, a licensed power limited technician; and (3) the individual's employer has on file with the commissioner a current certificate of responsible person, signed by the responsible master electrician of the contractor, the licensed master electrician, the licensed maintenance electrician, the electrical engineer, or the licensed power limited technician, and stating that the person signing the certificate is responsible for ensuring that the maintenance and repair work performed by the employer's employees complies with the Minnesota Electrical Act and the rules adopted under that act. The employer must pay a filing fee to file a certificate of responsible person with the commissioner. The certificate shall expire two years from the date of filing. In order to maintain a current certificate of responsible person, the employer must resubmit a certificate of responsible person, with a filing fee, no later than two years from the date of the previous submittal. (b) Employees of a licensed electrical or technology systems contractor or other employer where provided with supervision by a master electrician in accordance with subdivision 1, or power limited technician in accordance with subdivision 7, paragraph (a), clause (1), are not required to hold a license under sections 326B.31 to 326B.399 for the planning, laying out, installing, altering, and repairing of technology circuits or systems except planning, laying out, or installing: (1) in other than residential dwellings, class 2 or class 3 remote control circuits that control circuits or systems other than class 2 or class 3, except circuits that interconnect these systems through communication, alarm, and security systems are exempted from this paragraph; (2) class 2 or class 3 circuits in electrical cabinets, enclosures, or devices containing physically unprotected circuits other than class 2 or class 3; deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin (3) class 4 circuits or systems; or new text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end technology circuits or systems in hazardous classified locations as covered by the National Electrical Code. (c) Companies and their employees that plan, lay out, install, alter, or repair class 2 and class 3 remote control wiring associated with plug or cord and plug connected appliances other than security or fire alarm systems installed in a residential dwelling are not required to hold a license under sections 326B.31 to 326B.399. (d) Heating, ventilating, air conditioning, and refrigeration contractors and their employees are not required to hold or obtain a license under sections 326B.31 to 326B.399 when performing heating, ventilating, air conditioning, or refrigeration work as described in section 326B.38. (e) Employees of any electrical, communications, or railway utility, cable communications company as defined in section 238.02, or a telephone company as defined under section 237.01 or its employees, or of any independent contractor performing work on behalf of any such utility, cable communications company, or telephone company, shall not be required to hold a license under sections 326B.31 to 326B.399: (1) while performing work on installations, materials, or equipment which are owned or leased, and operated and maintained by such utility, cable communications company, or telephone company in the exercise of its utility, antenna, or telephone function, and which: (i) are used exclusively for the generation, transformation, distribution, transmission, or metering of electric current, or the operation of railway signals, or the transmission of intelligence and do not have as a principal function the consumption or use of electric current or provided service by or for the benefit of any person other than such utility, cable communications company, or telephone company; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (ii) are generally accessible only to employees of such utility, cable communications company, or telephone company or persons acting under its control or direction; and (iii) are not on the load side of the service point or point of entrance for communication systems; (2) while performing work on installations, materials, or equipment which are a part of the street lighting operations of such utility; or (3) while installing or performing work on outdoor area lights which are directly connected to a utility's distribution system and located upon the utility's distribution poles, and which are generally accessible only to employees of such utility or persons acting under its control or direction. (f) An individual who physically performs electrical work on a residential dwelling that is located on a property the individual owns and actually occupies as a residence or owns and will occupy as a residence upon completion of its construction is not required to hold or obtain a license under sections 326B.31 to 326B.399 if the residential dwelling has a separate electrical utility service not shared with any other residential dwelling. (g) Companies and their employees licensed under section 326B.164 shall not be required to hold or obtain a license under sections 326B.31 to 326B.399 while performing elevator work. Sec. 10. new text begin MISCLASSIFICATION FRAUD IMPACT REPORT.new text end new text begin (a) Every two years, the commissioners of revenue, employment and economic development, and labor and industry must coordinate to conduct an analysis of the costs of misclassification to illustrate how misclassification impacts misclassified workers, government programs, and tax collections. new text end new text begin (b) By January 15 of every odd-numbered year, beginning January 15, 2027, the commissioner of labor and industry must report on the analysis performed under paragraph (a) to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over taxes, workforce, and labor. The commissioner of labor and industry may contract with external experts or an independent third party to conduct a study, develop a report, and perform other functions. new text end new text begin (c) At a minimum, the study and report must provide: new text end new text begin (1) an estimate of the number of workers experiencing misclassification in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) an estimate of the cost of misclassification to impacted workers; new text end new text begin (3) an estimate of the prevalence of misclassification by industry; and new text end new text begin (4) an estimate of the impact to: new text end new text begin (i) the unemployment insurance trust fund; new text end new text begin (ii) the family and medical benefit insurance account; new text end new text begin (iii) state income tax collection; new text end new text begin (iv) the workers' compensation fund; and new text end new text begin (v) the workforce development fund. new text end new text begin (d) Data and information relevant to the required report elements in paragraph (c) must be provided to the commissioner of labor and industry for purposes of the study and report, including but not limited to the following: new text end new text begin (1) from the Department of Employment and Economic Development, information and data relevant to: new text end new text begin (i) the unemployment insurance trust fund; new text end new text begin (ii) the family and medical benefit insurance account; new text end new text begin (iii) unemployment insurance program audits and findings; and new text end new text begin (iv) the workforce development fund; new text end new text begin (2) from the Department of Revenue, information and data relevant to: new text end new text begin (i) misclassification tax audits and findings; new text end new text begin (ii) income tax collection; and new text end new text begin (iii) 1099 filings; and new text end new text begin (3) from the Department of Labor and Industry, information and data relevant to: new text end new text begin (i) misclassification complaints, investigations, and findings; and new text end new text begin (ii) the workers' compensation fund. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: H2441-1 116L.35 INVENTORY OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS. (a) By January 15, 2020, and by January 15 of each even-numbered year thereafter, the commissioner of employment and economic development must submit a report to the chairs of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development that provides an inventory of all economic development programs, including any workforce development programs, either provided by or overseen by any agency of the state of Minnesota. (b) Programs related to economic development that must be included in the report include those that: (1) receive federal funds or state funds; (2) provide assistance to either businesses or individuals; or (3) support internships, apprenticeships, career and technical education, or any form of employment training. (c) For each economic development program, the report must include, at a minimum, the following information: (1) details of program costs; (2) the number of staff, both within the department and any outside organization; (3) the number of program participants; (4) the demographic information including, but not limited to, race, age, gender, and income of program participants; (5) a list of any and all subgrantees receiving funds from the program, as well as the amount of funding received; (6) information about other sources of funding including other public or private funding or in-kind donations; (7) evidence that: (i) the organization administering a program; (ii) a business receiving a loan for a new or expanded business from a program; or (iii) a subgrantee of a program is in good standing with the Minnesota Secretary of State and the Minnesota Department of Revenue; (8) a short description of what each program does; and (9) to the extent practical, quantifiable measures of program success. (d) In addition to the information required under paragraph (c), a program related to economic development under paragraph (b) that requests an increase in state funding over the previous biennium must provide the following: (1) detailed information regarding the need for increased funds; and (2) the planned uses of the increased funds. 116L.98 WORKFORCE PROGRAM OUTCOMES. Subd. 7. Workforce program net impact analysis. (a) By January 15, 2015, the commissioner must report to the committees of the house of representatives and the senate having jurisdiction over economic development and workforce policy and finance on the results of the net impact pilot project already underway as of the date of enactment of this section. (b) The commissioner shall contract with an independent entity to conduct an ongoing net impact analysis of the programs included in the net impact pilot project under paragraph (a), career pathways programs, and any other programs deemed appropriate by the commissioner. The net impact methodology used by the independent entity under this paragraph must be based on the methodology and evaluation design used in the net impact pilot project under paragraph (a). (c) By January 15, 2017, and every four years thereafter, the commissioner must report to the committees of the house of representatives and the senate having jurisdiction over economic development and workforce policy and finance the following information for each program subject to paragraph (b): (1) the net impact of workforce services on individual employment, earnings, and public benefit usage outcomes; and (2) a cost-benefit analysis for understanding the monetary impacts of workforce services from the participant and taxpayer points of view. The report under this paragraph must be made available to the public in an electronic format on the Department of Employment and Economic Development's website. (d) The department is authorized to create and maintain data-sharing agreements with other departments, including corrections, human services, and any other department that are necessary to complete the analysis. The department shall supply the information collected for use by the independent entity conducting net impact analysis pursuant to the data practices requirements under chapters 13, 13A, 13B, and 13C. Repealed Minnesota Session Laws: H2441-1 Laws 2024, chapter 120, article 1, section 13 Sec. 13. new text begin JOB CREATION FUND; TRANSFER OUT.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 is transferred from the job creation fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8748, to the general fund. This is a onetime transfer. new text end